I love vintage jewelry and have kindly been given various pieces by my Grandma (an antiques dealer!). Some were missing a few stones, but I fixed them using items which were beyond repair. Some of the brooches don't have pins, but they will still look stunning stitched to the front of a bag.
So, that’s the situation I was in when I won Authonomy Live: six years of hard work, three major rewrites as well as countless small revisions. That’s your overnight success!
I was dithering about what to do for carpeting in the dining room for weeks (or months really). I originally wanted leopard wall-to-wall. It turned out to be very expensive (around $2500). I then thought I’d get an area rug, but none of the ones I looked at really worked. But one of the rugs I brought home to try out was very light and that made me think of light colored (not leopard) wall-to-wall.
Angie Porter has never wanted kids. Instead, she has an apartment above the bookstore she owns with her friend Peter, two cats, and a boyfriend who doesn't ask for more time or commitment than she's willing to give. Her life is as comfortable and confining as a snail's shell. Then Iraq invades Kuwait and Peter is called to active duty. His anthropologist wife is in Africa and unreachable. Angie reluctantly agrees to take care of Peter's three boys until Maureen comes home. Weeks pass by with no word from Maureen. Angie becomes “not-mom” to kids devastated by their parents’ absence. The pressures of a life she never wanted knock down the protective walls Angie has built around herself. By the time Maureen finally comes home, Angie has lost everything that mattered to her, gained some things she never knew she wanted, and is ready to rebuild her life.
Yvette Cooper, the shadow work and pensions secretary, affirmed the IFS estimates noting that " George Osborne's budget was a typical Tory budget - unfair and hitting those on lower incomes hardest".
We had another customer who had frequented our bar for far too long. Each time the customer would come in, the entire staff would dread it and avoid her if they could. With each glass of wine she drank, the louder and more obnoxious she would get. Eventually it got to the point where her conversation topics and the volume of her voice were just too inappropriate for our restaurant environment. We had to draw the line when she started inflicting her bad behavior on a poor, unsuspecting couple who was celebrating their anniversary.
The results from the research will be disseminated through national and international journals, popular media, policy briefs, international and national seminars, the internet, working groups and demonstration plots.
On Monday January 23, 2012, LA Mayor Villaraigosa signed the ordinance into law. The law went “into effect” March 5th. The City Administrator’s Office (CAO) has been tasked with developing a process for implementation.
This cover was released on the soundtrack for the oft-forgotten James Cameron-penned Strange Days, a marvellous cyberpunk film starring Ralph Fiennes. Juliette Lewis starts as a wannabe-star and performs two tracks in the movie, shown below. If you can, track down both the film and the soundtrack, as both are fantastic.
Here's to 2010.
So we have visited 3 churches in this area. The first is the closest in proximity to our apartment, we could walk if we wanted to. It's probably the most "hip" of the churches we have visited. The music is great. The preaching is good. The reason this isn't the church for us is that out of four visits two sermons were about sexual immorality. Not that I don't think this is an okay topic, and the pastor had great things to say, but one of those was on Christmas Eve?!? Also the pastor is whisked away or disappears during his prayer at the end of the sermon leaving the sanctuary for unknown places. He leaves the "Jones Road" campus pastor to finish up and actually be a pastor and not just a speaker. Also they pray the sinners prayer each week and then just ask you to go see someone in the hallway if you prayed the prayer, no actual invitation. These are all little things, but they are also odd to me.
And it had a $15 Starbucks gift card and a $25 Bath & Body Works gift card.
I spent the afternoon chatting with other volunteers and learning about what goes on there. I started mulching and then helped turn over and move some compost piles. They get their food scraps once a week from the SF Zen Center located just up the street. I have to say, the smell, well it was pretty ripe. I finished up by sampling some of cherry tomatoes that were freshly picked.
So… me? Huge fan. New game? Sign me up. I downloaded the first episode last night. After getting disemboweled because I looked at a walker too long, I decided to put the controller down and go to bed. It was way after midnight, and thus my bedtime. I finished the episode up this morning. It’s a very interesting idea. Rather than having controller schemes and buttons to memorize, everything is right there on the screen. Your reticule is actually the four buttons under your thumb. When you highlight an object that you can interact with, the actions pop up on the reticule. To look at something, press the top button. To use it, press the bottom button. To use a tool in your inventory (conveniently listed to the left of the screen), press the left or right button. When zombies attack, button mash and try to keep the reticule on the walker’s head. There are a series of decisions that you have to make. I didn’t even realize there was much of a choice until the end of the chapter when it compares your actions to those of the rest of the world. It turns out almost everyone is willing to save a little boy over someone else, but other decisions are far more equitable. Sometimes you are forced to choose who you are going to save. Warning: you probably won’t be able to save both. Sometimes you have to choose who to agree with in an argument. Sometimes you just have to choose conversation options. Overall, the frantic moments are mixed in well with the calm or depressing moments.
“I’m from America, from the West Coast.”
In The Rescuer’s Path, a Holocaust survivor’s young daughter finds and aids a wounded fugitive, the half-Arab antiwar leader suspected of a lethal truck bombing. The two become friends, then lovers, and eventually flee the FBI to seeming refuge in the Colorado Rockies. But, after a brief idyll, pursuit closes in and leads to tragedy. In the aftermath, the couple’s baby daughter is yielded at birth for adoption; thirty years later, in the shadows of 9/11, this grown daughter seeks the truth about her heritage.
Then there are human studies (on bone marrow) where they talk about doses of 10(-6)M to 10(-4)M being effective. What’s a 10(-6)M?
Praise is the nearest thing to sunshine, in that it helps us all to grow. Nobody is perfect, but everybody is amazing. That’s what’s so great about life. Nobody deserves to be treated like a nobody. A few well chosen words of sincere encouragement will do wonders for your budding artist friend.
the spirit of Christ."
I needn’t have worried. This is an album positively brimming with variation both in terms of musical style as well as lyrical content that retains Poly’s penchant for observant, witty, cynical and pointed socio-eco comment on war and racism.
in part.
“Are you OK, baby?”
Remove the chicken to a sιde platter.
Our wings are clipped and torn
I want real things that get worn, have a patina, that I can touch, like I can touch you. Things that have aromas, things that give me goose bumps, that fly in the breeze, that get broken, that prove that we live in the moment by changing with our moods. So there is the first part of solving the puzzle of the tunnel.
766 D-VII/24/1978. “Historical Perspective on the Bill of Rights.” Conference on Individual Rights and the Concept of Equality, Alumni College, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Selby: *snore*
Very luckily, I have an awesome husband who does cool stuff like suprising me with a trip to Napa for my birthday. So I am peacing out on Friday, and leaving my bullshit behind for a weekend, in order to enjoy my husband and all of the greenery, good food and coastal views (maybe) that northern Cali can possibly offer us in two days. Because of this, however, I must work extra hard today and tomorrow, since I don’t want to be in the awkward position of having to leave my bosses to finish my work (which they would have to, since I absolutely refuse to cancel this trip or to work while in Napa). Plus, I think they may be trying to work me to death — since my death would be cheaper than laying me off (I think they have life insurance me, to boot) — and I’m not havin’ any of that.
As nationwide opposition against the controversial United Nations Agenda 21 “sustainability” plan continues to build, a popular bill in Arizona that analysts say looks set to pass would prohibit all state agencies and political subdivisions from implementing or supporting any portion of the UN’s so-called “sustainable development” scheme. The legislation was approved by the state Senate last month and has already cleared initial hurdles in Arizona’s House of Representatives.
This article is written in order to make you informed about the usage of Ladders. It tells you that what are the types of ladders, what things should be considered in a ladder before making a buying decision for it.
Hope you all had a very blessed and peaceful Thanksgiving! Thank you for the moon, for sweet children, and for happy grandpa hugs. Thank you for old junky furniture and big fat tubs of juicy paint. Miss you, Anne Marie... hugs. :P Cara
07-06 Paris, France – Zenith
Once cooked through, carefully remove the ramekins from the roasting pan, run a knife around the edge and turn out onto a plate. Mine came out fairly easily with a minimum or angst and drama, but next time, I will take better care with my butter and flour in the crevices as the caked did stick a bit around the edges. Top with sauce and serve.
In any fight against the violent hostile forces who threaten peace and security, it is the right of British people to go peacefully about their business which should trump the rights of those determined to rob them of that right.
Step 2- Let dry over night. Super boring step.
So after very little sleep last night (no fault of my children, just my brain's inability to shut off), we were up this morning, packing lunchboxes, putting on school uniforms, taking photos. Jack and Phoebe had some lovely pictures taken on the front step, before Phoebs accidently pushed the school boy onto the concrete. He left quite a bit of knee-skin on the driveway, poor little man! After some magic cream, a few hundred Simpsons bandaids and some Mummy-cuddles, we were back on track. I managed to get the team into the car and on the road by 8:15, which I thought was quite a good effort. And then we arrived at school. (Deep breath...)
“These Foolish Things Remind Me Of You”
When your only friends growing up are a giraffe, a herd of elephants, a smattering of lions, and a chimp named Rocky, your sense of right and wrong is bound to be somewhat off-kilter compared to the rest of humanity. How else can you explain the kooky positions held by the shapely protagonist in Golden Temple Amazons (a.k.a. Amazons in the Temple of Gold), a Jess Franco jungle adventure film produced by the fine folks at Eurociné. Let's say you're little white girl growing up in the jungles of Africa, and your father steels some gold from a mysterious tribe of all-white Amazonian women. And let's say they track said loved one down to his hubristic den of colonial vulgarity, and kill your gold-stealing father and your mother with poison arrows. Do you: A) Swear to revenge their deaths; B) Shrug your shoulders and do nothing; or C) Thank the scantily clad white women for ridding the world of another pair of drunken prats, and ask them to join their tribe. While most normal people, myself included, would have chosen the third option without hesitation, Liana (Analía Ivars) decides that she wants to avenge their deaths at the hands of a tribe of gorgeous warrior women; a tribe who seem to have an affinity for riding horses without the aide of tops. I'll forgive Liana for desiring vengeance when she was an irrational little girl, but the fact that her thirst for violent retribution continued fester as a smoking hot adult didn't make a whole lot of sense. You would have thought she would have figured out that her parents were dicks by the time her cantaloupes had begun to sprout nipples. But what about Liana's mother? Surely she didn't deserve to be shot into her chest with a poison arrow. It's true, technically her mom didn't steal the gold, but she did shelter her husband, and, on top of that, she seemed complacent over the fact that he stole it.
Be honest and frank anyway.
Blogs are a huge aspect of internet privacy though, and everyone has their boundaries of how much they will reveal on theirs. Most of you know me as Gecko, and only a very few people who read this know my real name because we have had dealings outside our blogs. As you would notice I refer to my Business Partner as BP, I will never reveal anyone else's identity online, especially when they don't know I write about them (teehee!).
Anti-dumping is a relatively new term for Vietnamese businesses. Enterprise awareness and understanding is not high, and they’re not prepared with necessary skills to respond to this problem. In addition, companies don’t pay enough attention to this issue; they’re not proactive and don’t make sufficient financial investments in human resources to appeal lawsuits.
There has been also been a certain level of photo sharing on the Ning, which leads me to believe that people benefit from seeing how others set things up in their classrooms. The music and videos sharing went highly unused, which is not surprising, especially given the confidentiality issues inherent in our field.
Despite the Audience Award it won at Tribeca Film Festival last year, City Island's the alleged charms were lost on me early on with the film's first family-around-the-dining-table scene—a terrible piece of writing that suggested writer-director Raymond De Felitta didn't know how to announce that the Rizzo clan was so majestically dysfunctional unless that dysfunction was dialed all the way past the point of any recognizable human behavior. The film only gets more graceless from there; I didn't expect any movie in the dysfunctional-family-comedy sweepstakes to actually make me think back fondly on Little Miss Sunshine, but that 2006 faux-indie Sundance sensation is a marvel of exquisite subtlety and nuance by comparison, with quirks you could accept and characters you could halfway believe compared to the wearying sitcom antics of City Island.
Kings of Speed
I bet you didn’t know under that live oak
There were others. Me and M bonded because I felt bad for her. Even in 5th grade I could tell she was a little off. D and I bonded because I knew if I didn’t, she’d somehow have me killed.
I wrote recently in a column how Mother's Day is of greater significance to me these days than my own birthday, since it came to me through a labor of love and sacrifice, whereas my own birth and life can be attributed to MY mother's (and father's) love and sacrifice.
"Well what do you want me to do about it??? Stop doing whatever you're doing to make him yell."
Why are “after death” experiences being reported now? They are all beautiful experiences whether or not the person involved is a Christian. Satan would have you believe that all people go to the same place when they die and that it is a peaceful, wonderful event. Don’t be tricked into believing what a “roaring lion seeking whom he may devour” puts into your mind. Satan is a liar and the father of lies (John 8:44), and is even successful in convincing the Christian of his lies.
In their March 2012 newsletter, Danny and Nancy Smelser, who serve as MD and RN at the clinic, retold the story of a 32 year old man who had been hit by a motorcycle last December. Because he was unable to pay for the leg surgery he badly needed, he had been discharged from the government hospital. Desperate, in severe pain, and badly infected, the man arrived at Tanzania Christian Clinic. They removed the dirty cast and bandages and assessed the situation. Steady rounds of antibiotics and continuing dressing changes have eradicated the infection and through the help of the TCC and its supporters, the man is awaiting surgery scheduled at a teaching hospital 2 hours away.
“I got a little dizzy, a little hot, but I’m fine” said Joe. He credits the inspiration of Dan Jensen. “That inspires you to give blood, to hear a story like that.”
4.JMPD are not real cops
Also, as they are white, unless one speaks to them, which can be avoided reasonably easily, it is even possible to pretend they are not immigrants at all. In any event those who are likely to be in competition with them for low paid jobs probably don't vote Tory.
It was Bolt and Poison.
So how do we pull off an economy-wide shift in the labor market?
cook just until the shrimp are opaque and firm, about 15 to 25 minutes.
and how we think
If you've been around this blog for a while, you'll notice that my reviews in the past months were of significantly used or emptied products. I've been growing a liking to writing about products only when I'm about to finish them.
WHAT: Outdoor Tournament at Hamilton Metz Field
I think a combo of the pizza, soap water, and running around may have done him in.
– In ‘Big Step,’ NY Courts Can Allow False Confession Testimony
In addition to veggies, I want to plant Genovese Basil for pesto and a variety of sunflowers for chicken treats.
It's the very definition of a win-win.
For those of us who do not want to be mined, outed or harassed we will need to take our business elsewhere. A line has been crossed. Once a retailer has authorized a POS system which refuses a sale without the relinquishing of personal data there is no pretense left.
Though it turned out to be entirely inappropriate for yesterday's blustery weather, this soup is scrumptious. It's the kind of thing you would dream about, as a kid, of being able to eat for lunch, being that it's not dissimilar to melted ice cream (granted, a little boozier!). The good news is, we are adults and can eat melty, apple-brandy-laced strawberry ice cream for any meal we choose. Hurrah!
GARROSH: Uh…yeah. So while I’m here, I wanted to—
Of the many illuminating experiences which can be instructive with regard to knowing that we are truly here, particularly after what might have been the accumulation of many years of almost forgetting that we are here for some good purpose, is the arrival in our lives of a brand new person on this Earth. Here is a brief excerpt from my personal journal about one particularly illuminating moment:
“I am forever in your debt My Lady” with this he reaches down and pulls her left hand to his lips, and kisses it.
* 75% of the time, the cover is the most important purchase criteria.
Wendy and Tony
:: They're the only insect that turns their neck to look over their shoulder. One did this on my finger today, it was crazy! nearly 180degrees to spot prey.
Unfortunately the film’s story feels too inert. The mixing of different plot threads, time-lines and psychic spaces should have made me feel disorientated and engaged me but the atmosphere has a dull edge. The most interesting parts feel derivative of better stories and films. Beyond that there are good performances especially from Akira Emoto and Kiki and the sequences that take place in the Starfish Hotel are engaging. Crucially though the film feels bland. The mystery doesn’t grip and even with an intriguing existential reading there is little bite and substance.
Selsor was originally sentenced to death following a 1976 trial, but the U.S. Supreme Court later invalidated Oklahoma’s death penalty statute. The Oklahoma Court of Criminal Appeals modified Selsor’s sentence to life in prison.
Yesterday I had a second attempt at my marshmallow and choc-chip muffins and they came out great! I think the mistake I made on my last attempt was that I had overbaked the muffins, though still in- keeping with the suggested time in the recipe. What I had not considered was that I have a fan oven and sometimes cooking in this type of oven requires less time...So I halved the time and hey presto! Moist, yummy muffins...The reason I have been cooking a lot of sweet treats lately is because I've never been great at preparing desserts or cakes in the past and always would prepare savoury things. However, on realising how easy and cheap cakes and sweet things are to make, I've become hooked. Also, at the bookshop, to raise some money for charity, we are planning to have a 'Cake Day' where one person bakes cakes or some other sweet treat and we have to give a donation before getting our greedy mitts on the goods! If it happens once a week or month, by the end of 2010, not only will be have raised some good money for charity but I'll also be the size of a small horse...all for charity's sake!
2 x small bags to either hold duct tape or possibly make up
She'll learn in time that proper young ladies do not laugh out loud...or kiss dogs...or keep frogs in pickle jars in bedrooms...or even watch ants scurry across cracks in sidewalks in the summer.
but there’s a nice heft to him,
Second don't work in the garden when it is wet. Some plants, like beans, have a greater disease transmission when you touch the wet plants. It is best to stay out of the bean patch when it is damp. Wait to pick until the leaves dry off.
Shannon was under contract through Jan. 31, 2014, and was to receive a guaranteed amount per year if he was fired.
He was also a representative on the Student Life Plan Committee, a tutor at the Learning Support Commons and a member of the Honors College Student Consortium. Glover has been rewarded academically by receiving the Rowell Provost Award, the Zalupski Achieving the Dream Award and the Departmental Award for Excellence in Biology.
I know you guys are enjoying hearing about what foods I'm eating.
Yes, she just gave birth to a litter (8) of children.
Four girls. Four of them. Not one little boy in the whole litter.
Stephanopoulos: if Romney is afraid to take
-- Solaris decided to join the Battle of the Books fun, which is why we have more horror this time. This bracket include 3 books from Solaris, 3 from Pyr, 2 from Farrar Straus & Giroux, and 1 each from Tor/Forge, HarperCollins, William Morrow, Alfred A. Knopf, Abaddon, DAW, Sand Dollar, and Macmillan Audio (our first audiobook submission).
Ready? Ready? You’re going to do this
Which brings us to the next update: our seedlings. Efforts to grow our own food have been plugging right along. We’ve been watching those seedling grow over the past several weeks now. It’s been so exciting for everyone! Watching those little green seedlings peek out from the dirt and then grow and grow. So rewarding. What lead to the delay of this post was some technical difficulties I had with uploading pictures I took at the beginning of the week of how the seedlings were coming along. Sadly, I was only able to upload one picture but I really wanted three and despite my best efforts it wasn’t meant to be last night. But here we are, a new day:
When we started researching hedges, we immediately thought of boxwood.
Then it happened: one day last week he began to be a sincere participant in class. His comments were relevant and on point. After class I told him how much I appreciated his contributions. Then he took the unit test and scored decently on it, and he was proud of his accomplishment. Today they jigsawed articles about the 1930s in preparation to read To Kill A Mockingbird. The other students in his randomly chosen group looked at me, “Really, Ms. L? I have to work with him?” One of his group members has been begging me to send him to the office or kick him out of class all term. As they discussed their articles in their groups, Manuel started to expound on the Great Depression, the economy, Hoover, and Roosevelt. When I walked by he would stop me to corroborate a fact of his. I would agree with his fact, we would discuss it in front of the other group members, and I would move on. I watched him interact with his group, all of whom thought he was stupid. They were having a real and earnest discussion of what it must have been like to live back then. Circling around again, I heard the girl who is gleeful when he doesn’t show up to class ask, “How do you know so much about history?” She sounded a little awed. I rooted for him silently, “Prove your stuff, Manuel!”
Me: Exactly.
The dam from one side
So update on “things”: They got worse, and then much worse, and then even more badly than I could imagine…and now they have been on that level for about a week now. My child is in an Adult Mental Health Hospital. I have to have a “code” to call or visit them….I drove 8 hours this weekend back and forth for two horrific visits, I am shaken, I am triggered, I am heartbroken…and I have no idea what comes next…so please just keep on sending those prayers.
Watson did wake me up earlier, and now I can’t sleep, so I thought I should try to do some writing, but ended up writing this instead. So much for my productivity, eh?
My birthday was spent in bed, donned in my best pyjamas, deaf in one ear, unable to talk in anything more than a husky whisper, unable to eat anything that wasn’t the consistency of baby vomit and unable to walk without looking like a tightrope walker who has never really gotten the hang of his art, or particularly enjoyed it. Not much fun. In fact, I would have even welcomed one of those surprise parties, with every loathed person I could think of in attendance, rather than be in that bed. But, I did get some amazing presents.
And the deal was made! This potpourri was full of seed pods and wood chips in many shapes, sizes and species. I also searched high and low for different bottles and jars and at thrift stores and such... out here they were still so expensive. I searched for them here at garage sales and that is where I found the best deals. I was lucky some realtors in our community hosted a huge garage sale day with a map and all... I hit upwards of 30 yard sales this past weekend and found numerous deals and still walked away from a few.
In the midst of the affairs of the vast universe He thinks of His humblest child in this great world, and amid all its confusion and noise hears and recognizes the faintest cry that rises from the lips of the least and lowliest of His little ones.
On the impact of the Mahatma Gandhi National Rural Employment Guarantee Scheme (MGNREGS) on agriculture and farm labour, the report refers to the evaluation studies carried out recently which have shown that while MGNREGS has contributed toward water conservation and water harvesting structures, drought proofing and tree plantation, flood control, micro and minor irrigation works and land development which will have a positive impact on agricultural productivity, it has also led to a substantial increases in the wage rates of agricultural labourers, reduced the availability of labor for agricultural operations and increased the cost of cultivation. In order to optimize synergies and bring convergence between MGNREGA and schemes of Ministry of Agriculture, guidance has been issued to state governments.
which seems to happen every year after my return.
I mentioned in the last post to spare at least 2 hours if hiking to Mount John. Not quite.
In terms of horror films, “Cabin in the Woods” does the unthinkable, it surprises you. With Hollywood churning out so many predictable films, it’s not unusual for the audience to know exactly what will happen, and we’re so used to this that it’s become acceptable. However, “Cabin in the Woods” breathes life into a genre that we all thought had been beaten into the ground. Joss Whedon (writer) and Drew Goddard (writer and director) take the formulaic and turn it on end, creating a deconstructed love letter to a genre long thought destroyed.
Babygirl is on three anti-rejection meds (eighteen pills per day), one antiviral (two pills), one antibiotic (one pill), and one antifungal (swish and swallow four times daily). She is on one medication for high blood pressure (one pill), one antacid (one pill), and her usual asthma meds (one pill and an inhaler). The majority of this is on a twice daily schedule, but it MUST be done every 12 hours without fail, for the rest of her life. We have already signed up at MyMedSchedule.com. They keep track of your medications, remind you to call for refills, and send us four text messages daily to remind us to remind Babygirl to take her meds. It's free,and anyone can use this service. Hubby and I are thinking about using it for our own meds!
I bought the Urban Decay All Nighter Spray in the travel sized, 15ml (.51oz) version for $12, which I would suggest doing to make sure it works for you. The full-sized version (4oz) is priced at $29, but I imagine will last quite a long time. Spring for the travel sized version if you’re only using it for a specific event.
For my card I used the following.......
11:45 – The Big Sleep @ Mercury Lounge Free (21+)
The people sing, the people sing
Level 16: MP Cost: 18, Attacks up to 4 enemies 3 times, Damage: 222%, 8% chance to stun the enemy for 4 seconds.
After French class, I went to the amazing (code for closest to Whole Foods) grocery store at Le Bon Marché. It has a lot of "specialty" items (cue canned black and/or red beans being specialty in France)....
In reality, the only black metal track here is the first track. Everything else sounds like 60s psychedelic rock, pop, folk etc. It just sounds 60s to me, and that is a good thing. So while yes, the opening track is blistering raw black metal, once you get by that initial song, this album has so much more to offer.
Apparently, Savage released some sort of half-apology over the weekend related to the following comment:
Dick Cheney pointed out in his 1990s “defence strategy” plan, America simply wishes to rule the world so that’s forging ahead following the Nixonian doctrine, ‘seize the moment.’
In this kit, you get exactly what you need to make two holes and hide cords for your tv! (1) hole caps- cords feed through that little slit in the center; (2) mounting bracket; (3) fishing cables; (4) handle to turn bit to create hole; (5) rod connecting pieces and hook; (6) drill bit for hole.
- Styli-Style Line & Twist: BOGO
I went to bed feeling miserable and ashamed and the following morning when I checked my mail, I’d been blacklisted.
My colleague, Dr. Karen Flynn, riffs on Steve Harvey’s latest in Sway magazine and why the Black feminist critique of media is not always popular, but fundamentally necessary to developing a consciousness that can empower communities and relationships.
a little under a week ago, I had one last run-in with my desktop computer that left me in tears: Too clogged up, too old, too overworked, too EVERYTHING, and it finally ground to a near-halt. I managed maybe THREE things in a full hour of working, and that means ONE email, ONE upload, ONE photo order.... Three things that should've taken me 5 minutes, not 60.
Here are some pics from the chapter:
One other thing those seasonal numbers show is that Georgia’s been on a steady progression over that time period. The defense took a significant jump from Martinez’ last year to Grantham’s first, but it’s the offense which took off last season. The trend makes you wonder what might be in store if the Dawgs are able to get their act together with special teams play and offensive turnovers, like the elite teams in the West did.
He takes my mind off linen-shopping.
I don't think you're made out of cheese.
UPDATE: Twitter has a good list of other Presidential Facts courtesy of Barack Obama. Look in upcoming speeches for these gems of wisdom- "Harry S. Truman became world welterweight champion in 1923, fighting as Harry 'Sugar Ray' Truman," "President Polk invented the Polka and danced one a day until he died in a Polka related tragedy," or "William McKinley was assassinated by Professor Plum in the library with the candlestick." Truly, President Obama is the most eloquent and honest President that we've ever had.
So I salvaged a few anyway, and added them to my chocolate mint cupcakes. I don't think they look great, and even if the mint leaves had turned out, I'm not convined I'd have loved them anyway...
Dinnae ye ken it wud double tha fun?
display and keep monthly records of
“Exactly. Nor can I imagine. There’s simply nothing to it. I just shin up on the platform, drop a few gracious words, hand the little blighters their prizes, and hop down again, admired by all. Not a suggestion of split trousers from start to finish. I mean, why should anybody split his trousers? I can’t imagine. Can you imagine?”
My friends and I recently started a monthly book club, where we meet and talk about a book and also eat food and make crafts. We don't have a name for it, so we mostly just call it books, crafts, and wine. It works. We had our first craft night/book club meeting last week and it was so much fun!
Faber: I have been arguing that you are better off in physical gold than in gold miner stocks, for a variety of reasons. And when looking at gold stocks, we need to distinguish between exploration companies and producing companies. The problem with the exploration companies is that a lot of them will have financing difficulties and they will have to cut down on exploration. They may not get financing at all. If you have 100 exploration companies, 80 to 90 of them could easily be out of business.
Wow it’s been a while since I posted. Sorry about that. I was in Britain two weeks ago, and then have taken on more responsibilities with a couple of volunteer/internship positions, and have found myself absolutely swamped. I’m hoping things will calm down in a few weeks, and I can get back to a normal posting schedule. Or my brain will explode. One or the other.
But, Patsy dreams of being a pilot (and, as we know from Almost Astronauts, it wasn't an impossible dream). Other adults voice the belief that it's about what people like, not boys versus girls. And (spoiler alert!), by the end of This Means War, the two groups of boys and girls have gotten to know each other and become one group of friends. Also? This Means War is not critical of those boys who happen to like go carts or those girls who like to dance and giggle about boys. Oh, at the start, Juliet in her unhappiness is critical of Lowell's new friends and of her default friends, Annette and Linda. This changes by the end of the book.
This room was filled with girls & my son for our annual mother-daughter Christmas cookie decorating party. I made dozens and dozens of sugar cookies and bottles and bottles of frosting and then set everything up for my oldest daughter and her friends to decorate to their hearts content. While they're busy, we moms chit-chat and eat.
And do you know what he did when I started bitching at him? He just took it. He agreed with me that it was really rude of him to be that late. And how he knew how important this was, seeing as how my ex never took me, blah, blah, blah. Who was this guy?
SEAN: The story came first. It just happened to fit in the genre of YA Paranormal Romance. That is the beauty of independent publishing; you don’t have to stay in the artificial boundaries the publishers set. It allows for more genuine creativity. YA is also Vivienne’s favorite genre, which leads us to write more towards that audience.
Inside the dough crust was a spatchcock stuffed with West Australian truffles. The crust, Pig Flyin' explained, helps to keep in the truffle aroma, and creates a juicier cooked bird. The only difficulty they encountered was trying to the keep the truffles in one piece as they were pushed down beneath the skin.
Okay, so maybe one further point before we conclude: one part I was really surprised they kept in was the fight scene with the main girl. In the original she gets beat up pretty badly by her boyfriend. In the second, her and her skeet bag (seriously, he looked like skeet) get into it, and he pushes her to the ground. I was all "oh this going to be all that happens" but then he punches her and such. I was thinking that might be a bit risqué for 2011.
So hubris basically denies the existence of God, or for the non-religious, even the existence of luck, good fortune or the help of others.
Spike Lee’s flicks have always been event-like to me and many of my generation. For 10 years starting in the late 80s, a Spike Lee Joint was the talk of the community. Sure he has had some misses like Girl 6, but for the most part, he exposed his audience to different aspects of the African-American experiences that a lot of us became interested in due to his introduction. Admittedly, the floating platform shots that have been his signature have been annoying at best, but you don’t throw out the baby with the bath water. Spike has always wanted to do things his way to put his signature on his work so that it would resonate for years to come.
When spring sprung, I finally made my move. His fraternity brothers had invited me and a few of my sorority sisters (yeah, I was in a sorority…don’t judge) to a weekend-long formal down the Cape. A bunch of us were swimming in the hotel pool one afternoon when my girlfriends and I decided to hop into the hot tub. We didn’t realize he was in there initially, as for the first 30 or so seconds he was underwater, doing God knows what.
Undeterred by the weather, the borders have begun to fill with lush new foliage; aquilegias have pushed up tall flower stems, ready to flower, Anthriscus sylvestris ‘Ravenswing’ has similarly produced long dark stems, speckled at the tips with delicate white buds.
We, the undersigned, support Hungary in its strife for all-European traditional values against Brussels-directed integration and PC impositions.
“Because people are changing so rapidly, some folks who’ve used natural remedies in the past find that these are either no longer working, or, conversely, way too strong. Homeopathics, crystal elixers, and flower remedies work primarily on energy, so some people have found these do a better job of addressing any symptoms of DNA Activation. As we continue to move towards light and away from density, we will find increased effectiveness from subtler “medicines.” We will also continue to experience what I call overshooting the mark, when we blast ourselves with aggression –whatever that means for us, whether pills, mega doses of herbs, too much exercise, etc. Think “subtle and aligned,” and you’ll remain on the right track.” Laura Bruno
7. What is your favorite and least favorite household chore?
What would Mother's Day be without pampering and indulgences? Don't limit yourself to just one day of the year, though. Sure, you're running a household, taking care of your kids 'round the clock, and perhaps pulling down a paycheck. But don't forget to make time to take care of yourself, too. Some real-world ideas — from other time-starved moms — for indulging yourself on Mother's Day, or any day:
Avoiding sugar is a crucial component of a healthy lifestyle, but, instead of consuming a naturally low-sugar diet based on whole foods, some people are still trying to have their cake and eat it too. Unfortunately, the belief that artificial sweeteners can allow you to have the best of both worlds is a carefully orchestrated deception. So if you’re still consuming artificially sweetened foods, snacks and beverages because you think it’ll help you manage your weight, please understand that you’ve been sorely misled.
Or what about the distraught girl who calls me at 2 AM because she needs a ride home after her date got drunk at a party and she refused to get in the car with him, and he left without her, and she didn't know who else to call because her parents wouldn't understand because they had warned her to stay away from that guy (yes, I know that's a run-on sentence. Shut up, I'm on a roll here). Yes, I'm aware of the risk of misinterpretation when a male teacher is seen driving a female student home at 2 in the morning, especially after she's been drinking; and yes I'm aware that the "safer" response would have been to tell her to call her parents and hope that they'll understand because they love her. But I've never been one to take the "safe" route - I help people when they ask me for help, and I don't worry about what other people might think. I give my home phone number to every student, every year on the first day of school, and I tell them to call me if they ever need ANYTHING, any time, day or night. Those aren't just words. Sometimes they take me up on it, and I'll be damned if I'm going to turn my back on them when they do.
Grandbaby was enchanted. He must have thought it strange to have seen so many brightly coloured
Oddly he came with a sword, but most often I used him as some sort of miniature evil wizard that would kick He Man's ass. Man I really need to find this thing. I had the waist joint so worn that you could just flop it back and forth, and I'd really have to balance the figure when standing lest he just bend over at the waist and fall.
just how much you care.
And last is a layout that I created. I tried to step out of my comfort zone and play with a more elegant look. I did not use any stamps on this project, instead I used the WOW! embossing pen to trace the edges of my banners and flowers before dipping them in embossing powders.
So far this week, we've mowed. Oh, and picked up more dog food. Matt's carpool ride is off doing training, so he's driving the van this week as the Volvo needs some work. Chandler lost a bracket on her tooth that is supposed to be under constant traction, so we have an emergency ortho appt noon Thursday, and hopefully the t-storms forecast will not interfere with a library run as well.
Last weekend I had the chance to experience and feel three kinds of love.
Now I will tell you everything of my heart
Blue & Ochre
Jesus used the image of a vineyard in a parable during his teaching in the Temple just a few days prior to the last supper (Mark 12:1-12). In this parable he makes a similar point, that God is the one who established Israel as a vineyard and he is the owner of the vineyard. When the Messiah came to the people of God, he expected fruit but there was none. There are several parables which describe the eschatological judgment as a time of harvest, when the wheat will be collected and stored in the barn, but the weeds will be gathered and burned on a fire.
This was truly an amazing concert. I laughed, danced, sang, and cried during the end when she performed Together Again as pictures of her and Mike flashed across the screen. Two days later and I am still on a Janet Jackson high. She is indeed an artist and a true performer. Twenty five years in the industry and still tearing a stage up, Miss Jackson you are and forever will be my idol!
A budget deal reached by Congress in December maintained the amount of the Pell grants, but will limit eligibility for the grants in two key ways starting July 1. First, students can only receive them for 12 semesters, down from 18. This change affects students retroactively, so for those students who have been in school for 12 semesters and planned to receive aid for another 6 semesters, they will run out as of July 1.
Don't forget some accessories:
At this time, we tend to find kohl rabi at fall farmers’ markets, not in the grocery stores – a sign that this beloved root vegetable is still not popular for meals in many places. Recently at the Calgary farmers’ markets we saw at different times, gigantic kohl rabi. More surprisingly, some of these globes are tasty and not tough, when you ate raw slices. I am not certain if this was a different type of kohl rabi since I knew from the past, large kohl rabi had tough capillaries in the root-beet, even after cooking.
"Don't be stupid. I told you that Jack won't like this!"
-speaking of xmas, all my shopping is done and wrapped. The smugness, it burns.
Obviously, our PM is clueless and is not under control of our country problems. As you can see, our very own PM is doodling in his office!!!!
Welcome to our happy and humble abode! Feel free to leave your shoes at the door, and make yourself at home!
Keller suggests the man may have been thinking ” ‘Um, thanks, but that’s not what I asked for. I’m paralyzed. I’ve got a more immediate problem here.’ “
1 checking
What the hell is wrong with this abortion clinic that they coerce a girl into letting them violate her with tools and perform a murder inside her own body, make her pay for it, cover up the shit they did to her and her baby, and call it “choice?”
This is my first blog, and since the 2nd Twilight movie, New Moon just came out, I thought I'd give the world a piece o' my mind about The Twilight Saga.
Yes. If you don't let it hinder you from doing things. From moving forward. Take me, for example, I have this insane fear of tornadoes. I live in an area that rarely sees twisters forming, but yet when a thunderstorm begins, I sit and watch the Weather Channel. There have been a few times I ran into the basement, which is the safest room in the house you know. But recently, I've been dealing with another type of fear. The fear of putting myself and my ideas out into the world.
I informed all my friends of the party about a month ago, and together we opted for a victorian party.
I just know I was in Mrs. Corden’s class of grade five students and one of my favourite people in the class was a girl from Argentina who couldn’t speak English properly. At the end of the school year, she gave Mrs. Corden a gift that said, “with all mine gratitude.” That stuck in my head so fastly. I wished I could have given Mrs. Corden a gift that said something so profound. I wished I could have given Mrs. Corden a gift. She gave us so much. Sometimes when people are giving you “so much” you don’t even realize it.
It turns out that, for fifteen or so years, it did neither. Helm refused to be slowed: he released albums, he played regularly with an energy that not only belied his condition: it made him look more or less invincible. Or, at the very least, admirably stubborn.
Usually we read stories to the girls before bed. Tonight Bekah (age 4 years 1 month) created and told her own:
Snacks: Fruit Cup, Cinnamon Toast, Jello, Granola Bars
I've spent a ton of money on underwear that the school proceeds to throw out if they are "soiled". So now he's back in pull ups, and he could care less.
Similar developments occurred in Lebanon. As early as 1947, Jewish students were expelled from Beirut University. Jewish "Zionist" organizations (such as the Maccabi sports club) were forbidden. Jews were discharged from public service positions and Jewish youth movements banned.
In the way how you can walk on Sneakers you can’t do with other shoes (nothing against high heels).
Doing “The Guild” online, on a shoestring budget, has allowed Day and producer Kim Evey to circumvent some of the obstacles that women still face in Hollywood—such as bigwigs who aren’t prepared to take women seriously.
Thrilled with Nelly, I made her one of the main characters in my next book, THE REMARKABLE LIFE AND TIMES OF ELIZA ROSE, in fact Eliza, my main character, goes to work for her as a lady’s maid. I needed a handsome, gallant highwayman, too, and rather than invent one I found a genuine one: Claude Duval, the mannerly, handsome highwayman, who would often steal a kiss from a lady instead of taking her jewellery, and whose epitaph reads:
Question #4: What is missing from IHeart Organizing that you would like to see more of?
Now it is a matter of Biblical “fact” that God (or rather, his angels) didn’t find anyone at all worth saving. But at this point, we then need to ask ourselves: what would be the odds of less than ten people in the entire region of Sodom & Gomorrah being heterosexual?
I looked up the word “premium” and there were literally a dozen different definitions, none of which defined it as payment for insurance coverage. And the word “agent” was even worse, giving several negative definitions—particularly for those that are young, independent and feel invincible.
For those of you who haven't heard yet, I'm illustrating a webcomic that is written by Sydney writer, Timothy Nakayama, through Greyhaven Comics.
For every FAD of my life, I've commemorated it with dog tags (purely by accident).
Images courtesy of Criterion Collection
Because it’s not like I want to be flaky about things… I don’t… I’m not (at least I think I’m not). I’m just a very firm believer in not being set in your ways, and there’s no other way to live that way than being open to experience. And that includes pop culture.
The Vermilion Band Boosters will be holding a community rummage sale on Saturday, April 14th in the Sailorway Middle School Cafeteria. In addition, we will have concessions, a bake sale, and businesses will have booths with additional items for purchase.
As drinkers we all like to think we are good judges of beer, and no doubt we are in our own way. However, we're all different and what appeals to one person may not necessary tick the right boxes with another. So just because you think a beer is "bad", it doesn't necessarily mean that others will judge it the same way.. Therefore put it down to experience and make a note to avoid that beer, or indeed any beers from that brewery in future.
Ah there's a question. Which deserves an honest answer.
Made a decision and let go of me, out of apathy
Leisha
I will be happy to experience some modicum of quietude and time to sort out thoughts. I guess it will have to wait until our trip to Florida in a couple weeks.
Duct tape them in the grocery cart.
It matters not how strait the gate,
potassium
which was yesterday announced by the government has to be one of the most foolish yet. It is a measure designed to relieve the pressure on accommodation for some people seeking refugee status in Australia.
You’ve all heard the remarks. The quotes.
While the potatoes are cooking, brown breakfast sausage. Set aside.
“If we have Osama bin Laden in our sights and the Pakistani government is unable or unwilling to take them out, then I think that we have to act and we will take them out. We will kill bin Laden; we will crush al-Qaeda. That has to be our biggest national security priority.”
I think age is relative, but until your body starts failing in some serious way, you can continue to believe that youthfulness is a state of mind. Once you experience real body failures then you know youthful state of mind is bullshit. Getting old is so goddamn instructive of how reality works. This is why one of my all-time favorite stories is “The Star Pit” by Samuel R. Delany. It’s a multi-level story where we get to see the limitations faced by each character as they struggle to fight through their own personal barriers.
____ Easily gets the meaning of a joke
What is with all the time spent with the politician? He is obviously connected in some way. His friend found out that the fake photo of him on the video camera on the bridge, had been supplied by his opposition. Ok. What about all the emails as well that were found at the end of season one? This show is a little improved but still has a few weak spots.
I am officially resigning from adulthood.
When it was first released, it was reportedly criticized as being too complex and over the top. I don't see either complaint as applying to what we have here.
This is so simple, but a great way to record the everyday happenings.
The people of God are being reviled and, in the process, their God is being reviled as well, for the implication of the taunt in verse 2, “where is their God?” implies a powerlessness on his part to save or aid them.
22 What materials/equipment is necessary for the job?
I realized one really surprising thing: I’m not daunted by all of this (self-publishing) anymore.
Children are strange little creatures, aren't they? It had simply never occurred to her to ask if she could change her clothes. In her four year old mind's logic, the rule at preschool was that if clothes were wet or soiled you would change into your spare ones, so therefore if she wanted to change into her spare clothes she must first soil them!
First, he constantly told lies to another as long as it helped maintain his control over the person. The victim, who attempted to communicate with the manager always met frustrations because the boss always denied what he did or justified his actions by saying “What’s wrong with it?”
Well, how could I not try that? So, I scrounged around in my fridge and discovered the base for my first leftover challenge attempt: Mom’s meatloaf. I’ll tell you, it looks a little gross (cause leftover loaves of cold ground meat often do), but my mother’s meatloaf is probably second only to my own (I’m very, very proud of my meatloaf!) So this makes for a pretty delicious leftover.
At one point she talks about deciding to believe everything until it is proven false, instead of only believing what is proven true. I haven't reached that point yet. I don't really think I will.
The questions continued to fly: Do I take classes with my daughter? Does she know sign language? Does she take swimming? Is she good on the plane? How many words does she have? It was exhausting.
While they don't offer any of the western dressage classes, they offer all three intro tests and I'm considering riding Intro C, which is new and not offered by some of the other circuits, but it's the first test with cantering. It looks fairly "simple" and would be something Lilly and I could have fun practicing for. I'm going to try to make it to three of the shows and hopefully see my score improve each time. It'll be nice to have comments from the judge for each movement. That way I know what to work on before the next show.
I LOVE to garden. When my hands are deep into the soil I feel grounded. And, not in that 'Man! Mom and Dad grounded me to my room!' way but I feel complete and at one with the Universe. It's theraputic and sends calm through out my body unless I weed into an ant community and then I simply FREAK out 'cause I'm terrified of ants. Yes. Ants scare the CRAP out of me. I will happily grab any toxin banned and known to cause grown men to start ovulating if it meant I'd never have to interact with an ant again. And, that's saying alot 'cause I'm antitoxin....except for about two weeks ago when I learned that cooking meat in an oven means it has to be cleaned up right away or it refuses to budge unless prompted with toxic oven cleaner.
To those of you/us using Blogger as your blogging platform,
Pearls - Kaisercraft
Twice.
meeting them I am deeply afraid of them. My parents divorced when I
But then again there is a pool downstairs in the building. I love swimming and looking out the window at the snow on the trees. I'm weird I know lol...
One other thing that was enjoyable about the whole series of exercises was that others were down at the hot tub each day. One “repeat offender” was a gentleman who was in Oracles of the Living Tarot, and we talked quite a bit on the various days. When I went to OLT on Sunday night, he was playing The Hanged Man. In the several years I’ve been to OLT, I’ve never been one to choose a card from the audience, but on that performance, I got to choose a card, and the period for which that card corresponded is the time during which my birthday falls, and the card I chose (entirely randomly!) was The Hanged Man…and, The Hanged Man is often a card that has been a significator for me. It was, literally, the first tarot card I ever drew in the 8th grade when a friend of mine brought a tarot deck to school that she’d just been given. And, in the Antinous Tarot that I made a few years back (in ’03 or so), the card corresponding to The Hanged Man is called “Drowning.” So, all of this, very strangely, played together…!
Operating System
The Upload key after generation checkbox will tell GnuPG to automagically upload your public key to a key server out on the internet…. it’s like a public encryption telephone book for everyone out there on the Internet. They can look up your e-mail address on the key server, and pull down your public key without directly needing to receive the key from you.
Table 1 from #1 is identical to Table 2 from #2
Well, Pear Tree Designs Challenge Blog latest challenge is up and running and this week we would like you to produce a card or project to do with St Patricks Day!
One was a gift from our darling bridesmaids — dinner for two at Ramsay’s at Claridge’s in London. I wish that we had had the opportunity to take photos of our dishes, cause let me tell you — nobody plates like Gordon Ramsay. The dining room, surprisingly, wasn’t overly stuffy, despite being located in the veritable institution of class that is Claridge’s. We ate ourselves silly through three courses that had us tasting roasted loin of rabbit, thai-spiced lobster ravioli, a delectable roast loin of pork, a light and delicate john dorry and desserts that knocked our socks off — a dark chocolate, raspberry and praline sphere, and a gingerbread souffle with a blackcurrant sorbet for my hubby. I can’t even begin to describe how beautifully blended each dish was — flavors were in turns surprising and comforting, but always balanced. Fine dining in London is no joke. Watching our servers was like watching the ballet – everyone flowing together, mostly in groups, in what I swear were synchronized steps.
While in London, the singer took some time to visit her pal Drake, who was in town performing at the O2 arena earlier this week. The singer was spotted riding the Tube to the show on Tuesday night. Wearing her hair blond and shaggy, she was decked out in thigh-high boots, a leather jacket and a flame-embossed T shirt over barely there denim shorts. The only way she disguised herself was with a pair of sunglasses.
To find out if you’re a princess, please join me at The Moxie Store on Saturday, May 5, 2012 from 2:00 p.m. to 4:00 p.m. The store is located at 2 Main St., Lisbon Falls, Maine; right on the corner of Route 196 and Main St., across from the old Worumbo Mill.
There is one part of the military budget reactionaries are willing, even eager, to question: the DoD’s adoption of solar power and other forms of alternative energy. The Army, for example, wants to get at least 25% of its energy from renewable sources by 2025, and well, can't have that, can we?
Though considered highly homoerotic and a favorite myth of gay men (who are often highly narcissistic), Narcissus’ refusal of both male and female love points toward an almost asexual orientation (apart from his attempted/thwarted autoeroticism), and as a result he may appeal to the mystically-inclined of particular stripes who favor celibacy and sexual sublimation. As early as the myth was told, there was debate over its meaning, with the belief that Narcissus was not literally in love with himself, but legitimately thought it was another person he saw, with this view prevailing often into modern philosophical discourse. It could be a vision of the “masculine inner double” or “twin,” the projection of one’s animus-ideal spoken of by queer Jungians (e.g. Robert Hopcke), and discussed as early as Plato’s Symposium. The failure to realize this projection of one’s desires onto an exterior reality that rarely meets one’s standards is a difficulty which is at the root of many relationship difficulties in the lives of gay men.
We are joined by Carlos Rivera and Marcelo Rodriguez at the Spanish Announce Table, and here comes Christian.
and they put on band-aids,
While blogging this I’ve just had an idea for something using the waste from my punched out circles so hopefully if Hubby takes Little One out to the park tomorrow I’ll give it a try.
It’s in the reach of my arms,
The loneliness you get by the sea is personal and alive. It doesn't subdue you and make you feel abject. It's a simulating loneliness.
Then I lay still and said nothing.
I don't know who the real winner is here, but I think it's the mice.
The only person who can hold Conor’s attention is the man sitting across from him with the same blue eyes.
So nothing fancy this month as I close out my 2011 album. I've been busy getting my album all caught up from some of the summer months that I missed, but I'm happy to report it's all complete!
Today is my last fling in a skirt before the weekend when it will be jeans and woolly pullies.
The kind of day to write a letter.
3) A desk with a hundred blood-stained staples driven into its service in a seemingly random pattern.
Let's not stop at solar flares and CMEs. Nowhere is more Fear Uncertainty and Doubt spread around than what comes from the opponents of nuclear power. And about as good a treatment as you'll find comes from TFS Magnum with Fear Uncertainty and Government Policy. Quoting from Dr. James Conca in Forbes:
Mieka: "Ya. The birds' chirping woke me up. But that's ok because they love me!"
Has she been wearing the same watch for years? Spruce up her wrist with this Ballon Bleu from Cartier.
Each meal of your child’s life, both the ones you feed them and the ones they will eventually choose for themselves, are just individual steps. Some of them may end up being stumbles, some of them may be leaps; but just because you may have stumbled before doesn’t mean you have to keep falling down. (And I can tell you from personal experience, by the way, that if you get too caught up in the pride and excitement of the leap, you WILL fall when you land. I’m not known for my physical grace.) So if these things are true — and I assure you, they are — then why are we so hard on each other? And why are we so damned hard on ourselves?
I was so young and thought I could see your face in all of the wrong people but even then, I knew I couldn't live without you.
I've used a new release today (no 037) on the cover of my notebook and have no idea what the paper is.
the woods and the easy muttering of
For related articles, check out these links:
I was a diet coke junkie for the past 10+ years and stopped drinking them entirely September 23, 2011. I was drinking close to 1 gallon a day on some days. Now I drink unsweetened ice tea, juice and water.
"Nice belt," I say.
Well, possibly. Achievement comes in two distinct forms, that which is attained with dreams as the launching pad, and that which is attained without. It is possible to "succeed", by someone's definition, without the joyous, unfettered, amorphous freedom that dreaming provides. The question in my mind, though, is regarding sustainability of the success.
“No. I want you to go after Kayla. And take this with you.” She dug into her oversized utility vest and pulled something small and barely noticeable–about the size of a pink erasure.
Hemp offers an opportunity to develop agricultural and processing methods that do not harm the environment as it is biodegradable, natural and it will not end up in our landfills.”
They that had fought so well
In practice, however, this lack of any establishing narrative swiftly turns The Raid into a tedious exercise, a repetitive display of martial arts prowess that gradually changes from thrilling to dull to, finally, vaguely offensive. Never has the case been more clearly made for the necessity of the storytelling that action fans find a hurdle to surmount before getting to the killing. Late in the film, the crime lord (Ray Sahetapy) at the top of complex immediately throws off the imminent threat of a plot emerging by dismissively saying, "I don't give a shit about 'why' anymore." If he ever did, that puts him one up on Evans.
It had painted wooden beam ceilings, parquet floors, a separate bedroom besides the HUGE main room, original gothic archways and doors, three foot thick walls, and all sorts of original features.
Welcome to our first Caption Contest. In Collaboration with media mercenary Ron Fine, former press officer of F1 teams Jordan and Midland as well as everyone’s favorite F1 tweeter, multiple Shorty Award nominee and member of Junior Chamber of Commerce, Raymond Osalla, we bring to you, our first Caption Contest. We are currently looking for a full time sponsor so we can award a prize to the most clever caption.
The New York Times has been undermining our country for years. In the past we could ignore it – “the past” being pre 9/11. Sure, they had their traitors like Walter Duranty and their prevaricators like Jason Blair, and their ignorant “economists” like Paul Krugman (Somewhere there may be an economist with a worse record, but if there were, surely the Old Gray Whore would have had him/her on board by now. But Krugman is so thoroughly and frequently wrong that he couldn’t survive outside the Times or some soft spot, equally removed from reality, in academia. Just to keep the record straight, some blogs even keep a running record of his idiocies, mistakes, and ignorance).
"A horse, a horse, my kingdom for a horse" is one of the best-known lines in English literature, but the real Richard III never uttered them. His last words are among the few things about the battle of Bosworth Field in 1485 that were accurately recorded. They were "Treason, Treason, Treason!"
The fear of God is about reverence, its about recognising that he’s the boss of the whole thing. Its about humbling ourselves as an act of submission and worship.
Whew, not too scary! And since this trail is BARELY used I got to go off leash. Ahh...freedom. But a few times those dead piney trees made noise in the wind like "CREEEEEKKKKKKKKKKKKKK" and "OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO" so I'd run back to mom...just to make sure she was okay....you know...she was scared not me the big bad German Shepherd....
The more wines I taste over the years, however, the less I want to drink Santa Margherita. In fact, over the past several years I’ve boycotted all Pinot Grigio in favor of White Burgundy, Sancerre, Vouray, Falanghina and Verdicchio. (OK, so basically anything else.)
P-I just recently saw Sigur Rós in concert, just after we finished touring with them. Maybe that doesn't count, but it was really amazing!
The story is admittedly absurd -- and deathly serious, with breathless scenes of narrow escapes, machine gun fire and midnight biplane getaways, a state run by monsters and a resistance movement centered in ... the Catskills! Who wouldn't want to read a book with scenes that take place at "Albany spy headquarters"? The new reprint by Age of Aces is beautifully designed and bound just in time for some beach reading.
When I got home, Mrs Tootlepedal had completed all the work on the fence and the tidying up of the beds in front of it and was having a much needed shower. She is a hard worker.
Tear pitas in half (this time I used thin buns). Smother in olive oil and bake in 350 degree oven for a few minutes on each side. If you like them crispy do it longer! Then, break them into smaller chip sized pieces.
I am happy to receive this award from Laura of Kindergarten Kraziness. Thanks Laura! It also has my FAVORITE flower on it!! ;-) And yes, it brought some sunshine to my day!
I have put together a top 10 list of places I want to ride in the world, actually I have had this list for a while now however this is the first time I am publishing it.
- Tortellini, Prime Rib, Mashed Potato Martini
He said the slander, among others, meant that he was a religious extremist, was incapable of acting professionally and carrying out his duties as a councillor despite his qualification as a land surveyor, and had mental problems, with the innuendo that he was a mad man.
The bridge plays host to a craft market every sunday morning but at the moment there are no photos of the market on here as I am always too busy taking my son to play football for his team Heaton Hawks on sundays. I'll make it down there on a sunday morning one day in the future.
The Mint 6010 W. Pico Blvd
One basis of this claim the National Association of Colleges and Employers’ (NACE) …
that have a life of their own, and if you're unfortunate
Italy is a madhouse at the best of times, but there is nothing madder than the markets claiming that reforming its economy is the way ahead. It will be eventually, but this was just an excuse for traders to keep the pressure up. (The previous week, they wanted Berlusconi out; then when he went, they sold because he wasn’t there. That was such an obvious case of the agenda slip showing, I’m staggered that more people didn’t pick it up.) The simple fact is that at these prices, Italy now has no way back. The vicious circle has begun.
Me: You're just jealous because now I can get close to Lester.
I'm a phone screener. I'm not proud of it, but I am. I really hate talking on the phone and would much prefer an in person chat or a text if it's something that can be said quickly.
Recipe Challenge - Let's look through your stash and include at least 4 of the following 8 on your project: rub ons, ribbon, brads, stickers,
Short term bank borrowings increased some $300 million.Trade payables increased some $200 million. These are all very dramatic numbers which most investors would red flag.
models of constructive goal setting, coaching, and feedback.
We can’t wait to read Zack’s next adventure!!!!!
he enables me to tread on the heights.
Call it a measure of marketing effectiveness or hijacking if you will, but sometimes, marketing is just plain fun.
It states: “Countries with low fertility rates could require a significant number of immigrants over the coming dec­ades if they want to maintain the existing number of people of working age.
Dan saw loads of Christmasy stuff following close on the heels of the Halloween stuff that began appearing in the stores around late August (it seems) and asked if the Nola blogger Hostilidays You-Tube Wars would be beginning after tonight. Guess the only answer I'd have to that right now would be this. In other words, it could get hairy.
Maverick British historian speaks the unspeakable truth
My spellchecker is ok with the phrase “teh gheyz”, but balks at “spellchecker”. Truly, we live in interesting times. And I’m wrapping this up, because I like interacting with people and I’ll already be lucky if anyone reads this far.
in decades. The current government is pro-American but Odinga wants to
So I finally managed to get rid of quite a lot of clothes that I'd been hanging on to for some strange reason (they'll never fit me again, even if I do lose weight!!)
The guy behind the counter at the gluten-free bakery tells me he never heard of Xylitol. Too bad, I say, it’s a sugar substitute that is actually good for a person and it tastes just like sugar. I spell it for him – X Y L I T O L but he could care less as he continues to ice cupcakes with a glazed look in his eyes.
Next time I'll also be taunting those haughty No Trespassing signs.
These teachings could have made my troubles in the past year a little easier. I know it’s just a book and I couldn’t have fixed everything with this little bit of help, but it would have made it a little bit easier. Last year I was so inspired by Morrie. What he said made sense to me, as it still does today. I’m glad I woke up today thinking about him and his story. The advice about forgiving yourself is the hardest for me. As soon as I master that everything will be better. Forgiveness is so hard, especially when I have to forgive myself. The others on the list work out easier for me. I most definitely believe what I feel. If you know me well enough, you’d know that. Then there’s love. Love is what Morrie talks about the most. Without love what are we to do? No matter how low I feel, the love and support of my family and friends always brings me up. I’m not the only one receiving it either, I love in return. Since church on Sunday, I’ve been thinking about love a lot. Not your mushy romantic love, but all types of love. From C.S. Lewis’ The Four Loves, he explains how their are four different types of love. The storge, philia, eros and agape. I’ve been researching about them, but that’s not my point. My point is, I think Morrie wanted us to show love to everyone and for everyone to show love to each other. To love everyone you have to have the four different types of love. It’s really funny how things connect in life. On Sunday Darrell talked about loving your enemies, how God loves you and just to go out everyday and show everyone love. Then today, I woke up thinking about Morrie and how he wanted the same thing. It may be a sad rainy day, but I am alive and surrounded by love.
LITTLE CHANGE IN THE ANTECEDENT AIR MASS IS ANTICIPATED…WITH SEASONABLY WARM SURFACE TEMPERATURES AND MOIST CONDITIONS CONTRIBUTING TO MODERATE INSTABILITY BY THE AFTERNOON. A LEADING SHORT WAVE TROUGH WILL CONTINUE TO SAG SWD ACROSS THE NORTHEAST…INITIATING NEW CONVECTIVE DEVELOPMENT ACROSS SRN NY AND PORTIONS OF THE UPPER MID ATLANTIC. PRIMARY INITIATION IS EXPECTED IN ASSOCIATION WITH A DEEPENING SURFACE TROUGH…EXTENDING SWD THROUGH QUEBEC INTO THE MID ATLANTIC. SEVERE DEVELOPMENT WILL LIKELY INCREASE IN CONJUNCTION WITH DIURNAL HEATING. FARTHER S…A PERSISTENT KY/TN UPPER WAVE WILL MEANDER EWD…INFLUENCING AN INCREASE IN CONVECTIVE DEVELOPMENT OVER PORTIONS OF THE APPALACHIANS AND MID ATLANTIC REGION. DEEP LAYER FLOW WILL INCREASE SLIGHTLY ACROSS THE NORTHEAST…BUT REMAIN WEAK FARTHER S. AS SUCH…A MIXTURE OF SEMI-ORGANIZED CLUSTERS AND PULSE STORMS IS EXPECTED…WITH PRIMARY THREATS OF DMGG WIND AND LARGE HAIL.
I only had the opportunity to work with Ami and Jeffrey…who were both fantastic. Ami has a very calming presence. I think she enjoys directing her actors. It’s such a technical process that it’s always nice to get input from the director regarding your choices as an actor. Jeffrey was one of the nicest guys I’ve ever worked with. From the second I met him he was super kind. From what I could tell, everyone on set felt the same way. I was a little nervous to be working with him because he played ‘Comedian’, in ‘Watchmen’, which was cool. It was funny because he came on set and they had changed some of the dialogue for our scene, which I had received ahead of him. So he flubbed his lines a couple of times and kept apologizing to me. I was like, “Dude are you kidding me? You’re Jeffrey Dean Morgan. Don’t worry about me”. It actually helped loosen me up a little. I felt very fortunate to have the opportunity to work with someone with his experience. It was a real pleasure.
Why me? Why?? Is this a French thing, or a me thing? I'm dying to know. I seriously do like these people, but everyone has an off day now & again. This was mine. Ahhh.. the French. If you didn't love them so much, you'd hate them on days like these lol.
Welcome to the Corporation of the United States!
Freeze the custard in your ice cream maker according to the manufacturer's instructions. When the ice cream reaches soft serve consistency, add the chopped Oreos and continue churning until incorporated, another minute or two. Store in an airtight container in your freezer.
Benefit of i-con:
Everyone who sees him comments on how beautiful he is. We agree - little Jason is a gorgeous little boy!
“Oi! Who’s out there! This late in the night; must be some thief at work.”
You gotta be fair to Flair.
In newsrooms across America the story was dropped like a hot brick, although not quite like a hot brick, that would make too much noise, the story was dropped very quickly and very quietly, so as not to attract any further attention to it whatsoever. As of the time of writing this posting for instance, CNN have not updated their report on the killing since January 8th, and have not reported any of the latest developments.
1 1/2 cups of sweet sorghum flour
And people wonder how it came to be that we ended up with 6 children.
It's a REALLY good restaurant for steaks!
**this would succeed even more if a musician were to get involved, vote on the photos and make those photos artwork for an upcoming album (including single cuts/album cover/lyric book artwork/social media feeds). a percentage of proceeds could go towards the haiti relief fund.
Volksblad reported on 13 April 2012 that the outcome of this case is going to surprise people – The Afrikaans headline reads: “Steenkamp-moorde: ‘Uitslag sal verras’. This type of sensationalism, coming from a Naspers newspaper, doesn’t surprise me in the least. In fact, it is a menacing forewarning that their target audience (Afrikaans-speaking Christians) are going to be shocked out of their wits. The suspense has now been further aggravated by the announcement that the SA Police refuse to provide any further details about the case.
This is why I’ve been banging on about the plain packaging campaign by Cancer Research UK.
Mr. Matrix met Brother #2 this week. He also met my lovely sister in law M., and my best friend LisaLi. It went well. Exceedingly well. Mr. Martix was able to geek out with my bro talking optics, video games and the joys of post production visual FX. awesome.
By the time we got them home, my prize fish were getting a little ripe in the July sun, so, in the Indian tradition, they became fertilizer in my parents’ garden. These days, I’m a little more sophisticated in my fishing equipment and a little more discriminating in what I fish for, but I have never lost that joy. The joy of the little tug at the end of the line or the dance of the bobber on a warm July evening. The fever rages, but I don’t want to be cured.
The General Court has held that an earlier unappealed OHIM Board of Appeal decision bars the General Court from reviewing a subsequent OHIM Board of Appeal decision, relating to a later filed application for a trade mark, identical to the mark the subject of the first OHIM Board of Appeal decision.
“The brightness difference between the two stars made it even more difficult to resolve them,” stated Howard Bond of the Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI). Polaris is a supergiant more than two thousand times brighter than the Sun, while its companion is a main-sequence star. “With Hubble, we’ve pulled the North Star’s companion out of the shadows and into the spotlight.”
Sir Paul passed the milestone almost six years ago, has millions of admirers worldwide telling him he’s still needed, and is feeding himself just fine. What about us?
Besides impending snow doom and gloom around me, I've also had a rather piss off thing happen last week. So I mentioned in a previous entry about how I lost my Neopets account thanks to someone guessing my password correctly. I was a little sad, but not entirely disappointed with that. However, some month(s) prior to losing my account, I had entered a little contest that one of the Neopets sponsors held on the site to win some "Neocash." I figured why the hell not really. And then... I got an e-mail.
Gradually I warmed to the gouache, and found my own way of using it. I build layers and model with both watercolour and oil paint as if I am drawing with it, putting in little colour washes, then darks, then lights, and more washes, and it seems I attack gouache in much the same way. I found it excellent for lettering.
“Hey babe, bring your ass in-” the tall, slinky man opened the door. “Who the hell are you?” He pulled out a silver gun and pointed it at me.
So Dawkins began, ‘On The Origin of Species?…’ before getting it wrong and, rather touchingly in the circumstances, groaning: ‘Oh God, there’s a sub-title.’
c) Some of her first words upon arrival to her house typically are, "where does it hurt the most?" with a smile on her face. Sadist.
God’s wrestlings are abundant in this
Let’s begin this sermon with a brief review of Romans up to the twelfth chapter:
These policy performance failures became a problem for fiduciaries and trustees who had a legal responsibility to do the right thing for the trust owned life insurance under their supervision. “They wanted a product with a guaranteed premium and guaranteed death benefit,” Tessler explained. “They did not want to be told a few years later it had not performed as expected and they would have to spend a great deal more money on premiums than anticipated. For years trustees have been managing ill performing life insurance policies for which the trustee is personally liable. The trustee has an obligation to the beneficiaries of the trust to pay the death benefit. They need to know by paying this premium the death benefits will be there when the insured dies.”
And I know you guys probably guessed what I did, but give me your thoughts on my revelation anyway. :D
She sent us all a picture of her holding it and a video.
Paper: Fossil, Hot Fudge (MFT); Neenah Classic Crest Cover, Solar White Smooth, 130lb; This & That Charming 6 x 6 (Echo Park)
In order to correctly adjudicate civil disputes over copyright, the application of laws to such disputes is hereby interpreted by the Supreme People's Court in accordance with relevant provisions of the General Principals of Civil Law of the People's Republic of China, the Contract Law of the People's Republic of China, the Copyright Law of the People's Republic of China, Civil Procedure Law of the People's Republic of China, as well as other applicable laws, as follows:
I believe selling them off at this time is an admission of epic failure on the part of team Obama.
He died.
the longer I sit at night in the glow of the Christmas tree......
They say ‘write about what you know’ and I know about news…I know about the media and how it works, how stories get reported and distorted. I know about crime and justice, lawyers and policemen. Being a journalist is a great privilege - you enter so many different worlds, meet hundreds of people in all sorts of situations. It all feeds into my fiction.
and we will never be "this" group ever again.
I’ve written since I was 4 years old – it was clearly a way for me to express the supressed trauma. When my kids started to leave home I decided to see if I could get published. I’ve always known I could do it but had never really found my voice. I joined a local writing class and it became apparent from week number one that I really could write. Each week I got great feedback, which inspired me to write ‘Love Hearts’ – and suddenly I’d found my voice and had an agent and a publisher. It all happened quite quickly. The only other study I’ve done is to read lots of kids books and to read a book on plotting.
Hong Kong’s Best Shopping Guide – Electronics
The whole idea of a beer for women in the first place. It's never worked, because it's not what's needed. I'm not surprised Melissa feels patronised - I'd feel the same if someone tried to flog me a 'wine for men'. As Melissa points out, women don't want a product that segregates them - they just want a product that doesn't actively alienate them. Wine, cocktails, cider and premium spirits are neither masculine nor feminine, and they all seem to be doing just fine. The only reason beer is overtly masculine is the long heritage of macho advertising in the UK - beer is far more unisex in other countries. In Spain, 40% of total beer volume is drunk by women, and it's mainstream lager, same as here. (Nice mainstream lager though, it has to be said.)
I dropped the berry in a stream
“Women’s health.” We hear about this non-stop from leftists, and what they mean by that is always and only related to reproduction: free and frequent abortions and free birth control. When a leftist says “women’s health,” they never ever mean heart health or cancer prevention/treatment or . . . anything not related to abortions and birth control. Okay, sometimes they mean breast cancer and hand out pink ribbons. But that’s it. Women, for leftists, are nothing more than the sum of their reproductive/sexual organs and the management thereof. They harp on about how “being a woman isn’t a preexisting condition,” but what they really mean is that it is, that being a woman means that our “health” is only related to how many abortions we’ve had and how easy and cheap (or free) birth control is.
16. They Might Be Giants - Join Us
Throughout the country, there are hundreds of thousands of these public telephones for your convenience.
“They’re one of you, so they’re directing the show they’re going to be working on next week and the week after.So there is a lot of intensity and attention and care that’s sometimes lacking in other directors.”
Fabulous episode this week. The farm got overrun with a zombie hoard. The group briefly got split up. It was madness as to who might survive, and who might not. In the end two anonymous people died, none of the main cast did. I’m not even sure who they were, but one might have been the wife of Otis, and the other, just some bloke from the farm. I suppose we did get Shane dying last week and the old fella the week before. – Andrea did get separated from the group. I didn’t think she was going to die as they focussed too much on her escaping, then going on the run. As she was about to be killed I was expecting someone to save her, which happened. I wasn’t expecting the person saving her to look as “it did”:
Someone doorbell ditched us a plate of treats (yum). I loved the plate! Then we ate down to the center of the plate and it had a little poem about refilling it and sending it on. Well, that's not the sort of plate you can just keep around for whatever. So, we refilled it and Jake and Daniel went all combat and doorbell ditched someone else.
So why does the MSM avoid "exposing" these rude and crude anarchists. It's not difficult to surf the blogosphere to find a much more detailed profile on this 'victim' of police brutality.
It’s been a month since I arrived back from Morocco and I think I’ve just about recovered! In my first post, Monkeys mountains and the Medina, I mentioned that everything in this diverse, vibrant place was enchanting and beautiful. As a result, I thought I should probably share a few more of my 4000+ photos.
should complete my work first and then play
I've finally completed my blog make-over. It took me some time creating the perfect banner and I'm super pleased with the outcome.
You can’t win. Say your kids’ work is lousy? Consign them to years of therapy. Say it’s wonderful? Ha! What do you know? "You would say that, wouldn’t you? You’re my mum." (I’ve had that one too, from my own teenage daughter).
The race itself was on dirt road, gravel, and light trail. Except for a few hills, it seemed mostly flat. The organizers had tons of water stops, which was great because the heat and humidity were *killer* with the 9 AM start time.
-Go to the Glass Dharma web site, then leave me a comment on this post telling me what you want to get with your gift certificate if you win!
Thanks to comments and suggestions I have been trying to drink iced water instead of water at room temperature.
So to the strikers and this could be where they struggle in the Premier League as they don’t have anyone that has consistently scored in the top flight. But they shouldn’t be worried as Rickie Lambert who has scored 27 goals in 39 games in the Championship and is a similar player to Grant Holt who has done fantastically well for Norwich City. Alongside him they have Billy Sharp who is also a brilliant goal scorer and after a slightly slow start now has nine goals in 15 games. But the big question is will they have enough ability to score the goals to keep the team in the league.
Recently I received an email asking where I get my boxes, bins, baskets, etc. from. I decided that I would share it all in one post. Be warned tho, this post is loooong, with lots of pictures. I'm simply going to tell you where I've gotten the item in the photo.
Happy first day. Happy fresh perspective.
Be exalted above the heavens, O God;
Anyway, I think I just found the reason we get to be so sucky and not realize it. Duh-oh. It’s what makes the world go ’round. We all want to be remarkable and some folks tell us it’s just so damn easy to be remarkable. Just follow the yellow brick road. Buy the DVD. Do it for three weeks. Listen to the Webinar. Spend the day with Seth. Go ahead. Wind at your back and all that.
4. Tag three others and ask them to do the same.
This is essentially a book that deals with the racial prejudices of yesterday and today. It’s a complicated subject, and certainly not one that I feel I can address entirely in one book. But I do think that any time we hear a new story it gives us a fresh perspective on our world and helps us to see things just a little bit more clearly.
This breathless, insatiable lust for life pervades the album. In 'There's More to Life Than This', Björk gasps like she's choking on her own rising bliss, while the sultry 'Big Time Sensuality' has her vaulting from chesty growls to hyperventilating harmonics so piercing she sounds as if she's inhaled helium. But Björk is actually most effective when her vocal histrionics arc relatively restrained. The album's stand-out track, 'One Day', has a wonderful sense of tremulous, mounting anticipation that's just barely contained. Singing lines like "One day, you will blossom," Björk glides through a shimmering, brimming soundscape of undulating beats and twinkling keyboards.
* Ability to express complex analytical and technical information to senior management or to audiences with clinical training
You may ask, “Then why don’t all become righteous?” Because in order to receive it, you have to act on righteousness from the point of authority.
Will you be working in the shop? Can you cut meat?
9 may, 2010
Had captivity taught them anything? Will their freedom be short-lived? Will they act and live and speak as wiser, more humble people? Have they learned from the past?
The civil service is one of the easiest of institutions to attack if you are a politician – simply because those who work for it cannot answer back publicly. David Cameron’s comments about civil servants being ‘enemies of enterprise‘ went down like an iron brick – especially in those areas where people were (& still are) giving up their free time & money to drive enterprise in the public sector. The TUC White Paper on The Case for Public Service sets this out.
On a more serious note though, Chomsky makes some rather valid points in his analysis of the drug problem as he affirms a lot of what I like to rant about quite often.
It's actually got me concerned.
Saturday evening at church we were to raise our hands if we were ministers. I put my hand down. You see my ministry isn’t the kind of thing you want to form a small group around. It’s not a nice one by Mainstream Society’s standards and even some Christians don’t want to think about it. My ministry is to teach that abstinence and adoption are choices. One crime committed against a female could be a couple’s blessing. There are false positives for disabilities and God never gives you more then you can handle. A woman’s body knows what to do and should have the freedom to do it.
I’ve written about half of a mystery aimed at adults. It felt flat to me, and I lost interest. I don’t know that I would set out to write for adults on purpose. I think it would depend on where the story led me.
Being a manager is time consuming. If you accept that fact, you won’t resent the extra hours you spend at the office. Chances are you’ve found yourself stuck at work in the evening completing a project that you could have finished easily within normal work hours in the days before you became a boss.
Bigger news is that the schedule has come out. The Pack starts out with a stretch of four straight tough opponents in the 49ers, Bears, Seahawks, and Saints. The good thing is that three of four are at home with Seattle being the away game. Seattle is a tough place to play and a much better team than their record. I do believe the Pack can win each of these games, but it will be tough! The Packers face the NFC west and AFC south this year and neither division is very strong. Each division does have one powerhouse in the 49ers and Texans. The NFC north will be very competitive this year with the Bears and Lions also looking like playoff teams, which should rejuvenate these bitter rivalries. Minnesota looks like they’ll be a sub 500 team this year and potentially moving soon with their stadium issues. The other game that stands out is the chance at revenge against the Giants after the disappointing loss at home in the divisional round of the playoffs last season. This game will take place in week 12 with both teams making a playoff push which should make for an even better game.
Isenman AW, Warshaw LJ. Guidelines on pregnancy and work. Chicago: American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, 1977.
I'm not sure how I got here. But I do know that this is the first time in twelve years that I have ever said, "My youngest is five."
It will change your life!
There are several varieties of traybake recipes within the pages of the Baking Bible. I really should have started off with this one. As the title suggests it is plain and basic with no added extras. It is a great traybake to start off with. Unfortunately, I'd let greed get the better of me. I couldn't resist making the more interesting and tastier varieties first! However, on a day when I could barely keep my eyes open, I was relieved to have such a straightforward recipe to fall back on. This was perfect!
ISBN-10: 1616384808
“I’ve helped out on a local farm, feeding lambs and collecting eggs, because there were several young, fit and handsome men working there.”
So here is how I did it: I rummaged through my almost empty paint cans and mixed them up until I made a suitable gray. Then I free-form painted the circles, not thinking too much about placement. I wanted the circles to be like fat zen circles and less oblong. I made sure, however not to make my circles too small.
You couldn't make it up.
It has many many features my old machine did not have...
I recently stumbled upon Jute Interior Design and have been smitten ever since. Alison Davin is the designer behind the name and with 15 years of experience in the design world, she knows how to mix colors, textures and patterns like nobody's business. Behold...
The CSIR needed a sustained source of public funding to produce the scientific capacity to address these problems. Without it, the CSIR ran the risk of being "hijacked by private interests, which have no wish to open up this complex legacy issue", Turton wrote.
Pastor Barnabas Chong
Aldred, C., Green, J., & Adams, C. (2004). A new social communication intervention for children with autism: pilot randomised controlled treatment study suggesting effectiveness. Journal of Child Psychology and Psychiatry, 45, 1420-1430.
Tuesday, he got much worse. His neck began to get stiff and his temperature was rising and falling about 4 degrees in a matter of minutes. He became somewhat unresponsive when I would talk to him, so I called an ambulance. I couldn't move him to get him in the car. The ambulance came and said there was nothing they could do but I could take him to the ER if I wanted. They just weren't going to do it. Thankfully we have good neighbors all of whom are the volunteer emergency services here. They helped me get him in the car. My next door neighbor came over and stayed with Adrienne and I left for the ER at the hospital in Savannah. I wasn't' about to go back to the Army hospital that wouldn't do anything for him. They got him in immediately, started an IV and started tests on him. After a few hours I went home and he was admitted to the hospital for some sort of infection. He was on some serious antibiotics and pain meds by IV. He was there for 2 full days and got to come home on Friday. He has a follow up in a few weeks to see if any more tests are needed. He is still on his antibiotics, but is feeling much better now.
Book 3 - leather (handbag)
I'm not really sure what the hubbub about this milestone is all about anyway. I don't feel 50 so why should I act it? :)
Bacon , mozzarella (or ‘moozarell’ as they say here in New York), tomatoes, and a freshly cracked egg on top.
With visitors to Nellcôte including Gram Parsons and Hunter S Thompson, the consumption of narcotics was never going to be anything other than enthusiastic. One of those visitors was a young Frenchman called Dominique Tarle, whose photographs documented the goings on during the recording on one of the greatest rock albums of all time. He was invited by Richards to stay with them at Villa Nellcote, and ended up living there for 6 months.
“Nonoffender pedophiles have told me that chemical castration has given them relief,” Cantor adds. “So it’s unfortunate that we use the term ‘chemical castration,’ which evokes all kinds of emotions. When you get right down to it, we are talking only about taking the same medication used by, for example, prostate-cancer patients—some cancers are accelerated by testosterone, so blocking testosterone is part of the treatment.”
After the performances of Jeter and Bolt, everything else paled in comparison. Solid competition as we had on day one, and close in many cases. But day two belonged to Jeter and Bolt.
5/5 – White Angelic Blessing (temporary version) & Maple Coins.
You may have noticed that they were a bit twisted, kinky, over-plied. Well, that is the way I like my yarns! Okay, not so kinked up, but I like the twist in the plied yarn, and that is how I did them.
“Qwil!! What are you doing here!!”
It’s a terrible habit, I know, but I just love books!
Greta do you want me? Tell me this
Website Design Theme: Informational
Stacey looked from the crimson oil spills to Mattias's blue eyes. "No."
Ok that’s all for me, but now you need to keep hopping to see all the other cuties the DT has used today! And as always you can shop for them all HERE!
Sometimes it’s worth going both ways. If you have time.
Water: 3.5 cup
When you feel like you are in overdrive,
Throughout each of these pieces the continued relationship between the physical and the digital world is emphasized. Rather than the digital splitting completely from the physical world, there is a definite carryover of concepts, constructions and systems of thought. These scholars all note that the racial constructions and representations of the physical world are brought into the digital realm. Nakamura spoke to this in her lecture when discussing online gaming in which the visual representations of race were targeted and the racial structures were reestablished, even at times more brutally. As much as the physical realm has influenced the Internet, the digital in many ways works to reveal the constructed nature of the social systems and hierarchies. Nakamura highlights the digital visual construction of race as based on stereotypes and a façade. In the digital realm, the visual images can be modified, chosen, created and thus constructed revealing and emphasizing a façade of authenticity on which racial constructions were/are based. However, as Browner and Everett are quick to point out, this ability to modify, choose, and create can also lead to innovation, redefining, reimagining in a manner that better suits the needs of the diverse population. It allows multiethnic groups to take control of the construction and conceptualization of race. As Browner states, “race works as an archive, as a category used to create meaning, even as the very notion of race as a meaningful category has been undermined. The result is a site that challenges our desire for an easy or invisible interface” (222). Thus, even though the Internet did not fulfill its original hope of equality and democracy and brought the “cultural baggage” (Everett 149) of the physical world into the digital world, it has allowed for an awareness of and change in the constructions that characterizes the physical and now the digital world.
Something that will Surprise the World, Susan Dunn
soda water or sparkling soda
I know it by heart
Note: Ajinomoto isn’t something that should be used in cooking regularly. It has a chemical called Monosodium glutamate (MSG) and although it may add flavour to Chinese cooking, it may have harmful long-term effects. Please limit the use of ajinomoto in your cooking. You can avoid it completely in this recipe if you like.
You express that first-child syndrome, the responsibility of getting things going and keeping it all together. ‘You are, in a phrase, The Uncomplaining One’.
At this point we wish to assign colors to each season. Winter is white. When you look carefully at white, you will notice a sort of “radiance” that emits a
Yes, the Rugrat considers himself a serious analyst. And perhaps because no one has come up with a model to disprove him, regardless of the self-evident non-austerity fail, he considers his hypothesis to be true. And Reich is cut from the same dwarfish cloth.
then skipped right to high school.
On the blogging front, I managed new posts! After looking through the archives on the Toasted Scimitar, I re-thought my plan of re-posting until I have a chance to update the few articles I thought might be fun to revisit. (What? I like the prefix "re".)
Be contented. You may not have everything in life, and you may say “Life is unfair.” Appreciate what you have right now. Thank God for giving you what you need, for the people who cherishes and loves you.
Checklists & Timelines: It’ll be helpful to you to have planning guides to keep track of all the wedding to-dos. You can print them from websites and add them but if they’re already there it’s one less thing for you to do.
Well, considering that this is ALL the information I could dig up, since people on the other side of the pond seem to be more fascinated with posting PHOTOS and not Historical information on their locomotives, I must conclude with this post. I hope the next blog post will go into more detail! Happy Railfanning!
Four years ago, I was induced with Renae and had a horrible experience. My body just wasn't ready. Sammy's labor started spontaneously, and it was amazing. Not to mention his birth was much (much) shorter. Because of these 2 drastically different labors, with this pregnancy, I was avoiding an induction like the plaque. I was wiling to wait for labor to start on it's own, despite the fact that I was ready to be done being pregnant.
For me, one of the areas that most YA fails in is the way the romance develops and the manner in which the two protagonists fall in love - but here is was completely believable and organic, especially thanks to some of the reveals later in the story.
&I love that the weather is beautiful!
Thanks for visiting us today, hope you have a great weekend and get to have some creative fun :)
It’s now evening…everyone has been gone for hours…the kitchen is clean, the china has all been returned to its special place and we’ve been relaxing this evening. It was a nice day…everyone brought their assigned dish…from wine to dessert. The food was good – even if it was from the Weight Watchers magazine. Tomorrow we’ll finish the dollhouse and start working on our next projects.
The only possible alternative we have is to bring all troops to our shores, ports, and borders and focus on developing a real strong national defense. Only when we have revamped our domestic policies and got America off life support can we develop a Reagan posture of staring down the enemy, as America did with the Soviet Union. We will be a much better and stronger neighbor.
way; the devil is gone out of thy daughter. And when she was come to her house,
Lets begin with voice lessons. I believe with should start with the very beginning. Primitive music. It has 3 levels: 1. Ouch!! 2. Whine. 3. Cry. 4. Scream. If you have many little ones you know the stages by heart and your head and ears do suffer greatly. Offer it up!! In all seriousness, chanting the liturgy is hard and a very good way to practice your singing in front and amongst people. God bless, Father K!!
I've done a spot of paper piecing for her chic suit and I made my card out of patterned card for a change. Just a simple little bow and single punched flower and as I thought she looked quite chic I decided to make her French and added a charm (it's actually a charm of Blackpool Tower but that didn't have the same appeal so I'm pretending its the Eiffel Tower lol)
Well, since I have 18 days to sit here and twiddle my thumbs, apparently... I'm thinking I might try this. Anyone heard of it? The 5 Day Pouch Test
(pulse together in a food processor to break up the cherries)
and Tom from Tall Clover Farm
Akin to their heavily muscled, racially ambiguous brethren, the Paul brothers bring an off-kilter approach to their line readings that causes the person who is watching and listening to tilt their head slightly to the side while simultaneously making a nonplussed expression with their face. Loudly screaming their dialogue with heightened sense of urgency, the Peter and David bring an unconventional charm to their roles. Whether uttering nonsensical gibberish, babbling incoherently or merely mixing their metaphors, the thickly structured duplicates do so with an exaggerated brand of comical desperation.
Everyone in the book is suffering – My wife is unhappy, goes one chapter heading; My daughter’s unhappy, another; My little boy is having difficulties – and we don’t know how miserable they really are, and how much of it is distorted through Slocum’s poisoned view. If all first-person narratives seem predominantly to be about the narrator, Something Happened removes all doubt. Slocum’s story is a towering monument to himself. Of his wife he says, “I want to be free of her before her health fails. I see an ailing wife in my future.” When his daughter tells him she isn’t happy, “I told her I wasn’t either and nobody had a right to expect to be.” His weakness for honesty is fatal to his family. To his worrisome son (who asks “If you do want to get rid of me, how will you do it?”), he is unable to offer the categoric reassurance he needs. His workplace is not much better (the salesmen are “a vigorous, fun-loving bunch when they are not suffering abdominal cramps or brooding miserably about the future”), though it has its compensations. (“This fiscal period, I am flirting with Jane.”)
26. During the 19th century, Scottish Shortbread was confusingly sold in England as "Ginger Biscuits".
In one of her longest duration pieces, during a retrospective of her career at New York’s Museum of Modern Art in 2010, she sat in silence during the hours the museum was open, making eye
YOUR AUDIENCE WANTS YOU
I didn't have to work because of the Abraham Lincoln birthday holiday (happy 203rd, Mr. President!), so my best friend and her husband treated me to a matinee of The Woman In Black. Is it pathetic that the ancient toys in the film scared me more than The Woman herself? It's embarrassing to admit, but toy monkeys playing maracas and cymbals are a thousand times creepier than any ghost. Daniel Radcliffe did an excellent job as the young lawyer Arthur Kipps, but I have to admit there were times when all I could picture was him as Harry Potter. I heard an older woman in our row say to her friend, "I just can't get used to seeing Harry Potter drink alcohol!", so at least I'm not the only one.
The Bon Appetit Collection includes an impressive array of high-quality, modern stainless steel cookware; small appliances including pressure cookers and immersion blenders; as well as cutlery and prep tools. Each item in the Bon Appetit Collection is rigorously vetted by the Bon Appetit Test Kitchen and new additions to the collection will debut on HSN and HSN.com in March.
Happy bubba = happy Mumma! :)
Anyway, today I thought I would share some crocheting and knitting today. It was my lovely friends Kim’s birthday the other week and I decided to make something, LOL. …..well I made two things actually……the first being a vintage style brooch.
Now that my kids are older, I can look back with some degree of objectivity on all of this subliminal advertising insanity. While I wrote that any number of sports could suffice, I’ll stick with soccer for this hypothetical discussion.
He sat there watching the cove peacefully lying under the full moon’s shower of light. Its waves were rippling in the white light.
Soul Transportation--DJ Me and DJ You
Of course, this you learn through trial and error. No one tells you this, though everyone wants to offer advice regarding bedroom antics.
Now, for the nemesis part. Henry has been the most difficult dog I have ever painted, I should know, this is my 4th painting of him. My other 3 Henry paintings...ready for a bonfire come winter...include his full body. Something about that wild hair-do with the sleek body did not make a lovely painting, too much of a textural weird contrast or at least that's how I've justified those 3 bonfire failures. My husband (thanks, honey) has assured me "not all dogs are supposed to be painted and this one is just ugly".
So today was a FABULOUS day, just like I hoped it would be :) I, um, er, *cough* could have had something to do with the fact that I started my period last night. Crazy PMS will get me every time - LMBO!
For those you who get a headache looking at numbers, here’s a window into why this document may indeed reek of corruption:
Mango
I use a lot of brands of rubber stamps but my favorite brand by far is TECHNIQUE TUESDAY. The background on the white strip was made with a group of their stamp sets that I pulled one from this set and one from that set. I have decided if I can't find the right background paper I can pull out my stamps and create it! I encourage you all to give it a try.
Why not get yourself photographed in the appropriate pose (two photos will be required) and check yourself out.
FYI, I give 11th place, honorable mention to Marilyn Monroe's dress-blowing scene in the zany sex comedy 'Seven Year Itch', But you'll have to read here to find out the technicality that excludes it from this list.
Chris ordered this jumper on Amazon (after reading review after review to make sure we were getting the best one) and Durham loves it!! His feet don't touch the floor yet, even with it on the lowest setting, but that does not stop him from making it bounce just enough to get the music going. We recommend it! Here on Amazon.
3) 4-1 Tampa Bay and 4-1 Detroit continue whats been a great series so far today
Teotihuacán Mexican Cafe
Cigarette Burns
52. Koloko - Girls On Film (3:27)
That is certainly one memory I won’t be recreating for my children. We’ll just stick to a big platter of Granny’s recipe golden fried chicken, and leave the rest to the local grocer to worry about.
Okay, not really. I was smart enough to realize my chances of getting published were about as good as the Falcons winning the Super Bowl.
‘Our fellow Beings were not spared
The reason it's even in there is because about 5 years back the station was more of a block format that played almost anything that the DJ was interested in. In truth I think that would be a better format since we would then be less restricted and it may bring more students in to do shows. Yet at the same time, a lot of the stuff on the database is way too out there and unappealing to the student body/Island to keep them listening without a DJ at the helm. Stuff that I wouldn't touch with a ten foot pole, and I listen to almost anything with the exception of Polka or Country.
I was an amazing experience. My idea of the protesters has changed. I would do it again and wish that the class could have been there.
But in some ways you can see that’s just the opposite of the sudden silence. You have the sudden noise. But I was reading Keel the other day, and he made a point that I think may have a bearing on this. He says that he thinks that all these energies are part of a super spectrum of electro-magnetic energy, and he thinks that psychic energies of the mind are part of the super spectrum, and he thinks that one of the things that might be going on in these window areas is that the psychic frequency is somehow heightened in those places.
From the hospital.
I’ll admit I was angry. Technological monogamy requires a certain level of trust, and I felt especially pained to know that – just a year into what I thought was something special – Comcast had secretly betrayed the relationship.
Just another in a long list of reasons why I hate doctors: They cause extreme embarrassment. They cause me pain, both physical and financial. They make tons of money off me, which they use to sail to Jamaica and drink rum for weeks on end, while I sit in a dreary classroom having exciting discussions about the world of comma splices.
On behalf of all of us here at Punk Rock Bowling & Music Festival, we send our heartfelt wishes to Jimmy and his family. We apologize to everyone looking forward to seeing Sham 69 at the festival with Rancid on May 27 as we were all really excited to see them too. But we all know that family is of the utmost importance and completely understand why he needs to be with his father.
* Put the logo on your blog or post.
Unexplained? I’ll explain it: criminal are using guns to rob people in their homes because they know that the law-abiding are not going to be armed.
And this is all contained in just the roughly two or three minutes of the 9:05 video I could stand to watch.
but then again, there's nothing like a barbados sunset
And, finally, I come to Frank Moorhouse (b. 1938). I have to admit that I’ve only read one of his books but it was a great one, Grand days, the first of his League of Nations or Edith trilogy. The second in the trilogy, Dark Palace, won the Miles Franklin Award, and the last, Cold light, is, with Mears’ Foal’s bread, one of the five novels shortlisted for this year’s Miles Franklin. Moorhouse is another of our outspoken writers. He has been arrested for campaigning against censorship but, for me as a librarian, his main claim on my memory comes from his copyright infringement case against the University of New South Wales library. In 1973, the library authorised the making of photocopies of pages from his book, The Americans, baby. The court found that the university had infringed his copyright, setting in motion changes both to the Copyright Act and to the management of photocopiers. As much as I loved Grand Days, it is Moorhouse’s impact on copyright practice in Australia that I’ll never forget.
Jamaican Mini Bonnet 0/2
08 Omni Trio - The Half Cut (5:18)
Never has a hugely successful band had such success with one lead singer, cut ties with that singer, then gone on to have such continued success with a new lead singer.
Lots of good stuff is happening on Friday, also known as Star Wars Day – “May the Fourth be with you.”
We believe that a healthy body means a healthier and a more alert mind. Also, remember a healthier body translates into a more productive and more effective you
fold until no more egg white bits can be seen. do not overfold as more folding means more deflating
Lamb- the word "pesach" (passover) applies to the Lamb of sacrifice and the deliverance from Egypt. Roasted and seasoned with garlic, onion, and herbs.
8pm They’re now announcing that Ted Kennedy will speak. I have had so many fundamental disagreements with him, but he has certainly become a statesman in the past 10 years, and it’s virtually impossible to question his patriotism, even when his policies have been at odds with much of the country.
So there we have it - it was one crappy time beetle against the last gate-keeper of an intrinsic function of the universe’s temporal physics (or the champion of time to give him another name). And the stupid beetle lost. Hope that helps.
Spring is a dynamic time at the farm.
DURATION: 2 1/2 hours
I missed last Monday. I am sure there probably isn't anyone who noticed (or cared) but I am disappointed in myself a little. A couple weeks back I has 2 or 3 posts written, lined up and scheduled to be posted and not only did they not post, I lost all the content I had written. I am an engineer by training (college) and an insurance guy by trade so writing doesn't come naturally to me. Not saying I can't do it, just isn't in my wheelhouse. To have to rewrite some posts so early in the game derailed me a bit but fortunately I didn't once question my entrance into the blogosphere. I am having too much fun and making too many great trades.
Kendall's health is at a stand still right now. That's a good thing. We are still in a holding pattern with her bladder and hips. I'm not naive. I know there are some major things on the horizon, and as she gets older the CP monster and whatever metabolic issues she does or doesn't have will affect her in a variety of negative ways. But for now, we are living life day to day and enjoying the moment with her.
17 Makin' Time
Have fun and enjoy the happy birthday sex, Mrs. Pickle!
We our took our child out for a spin this weekend, and I can't wait to show you how well she did. Our little family of two just got a bit bigger, and we are beyond thrilled. Oh, and for those of you who clicked on this title thinking you'd see a baby sonogram or a cute and furry friend, sorry to disappoint, we're a looong ways from that kind of commitment :)
But I think above all it is the teams dedication of the season to Myra Kraft that put my over the edge. I met Myra on a couple of occasions and she really was a wonderful woman. She always had a smile and always remembered my name, even though I was just a waitress. She did so many things for some many people and the team truly loved her. I know that they will win it for her tomorrow so how can that not make a person happy.
I have to say it makes them look a little less....uhm...cheap....cuz they were. But, more importantly, I gave some beautiful crystals some purpose and flair!
It has now said it is ‘interviewing people at Ikea who were around back then,’ according to Ikea’s social and environmental manager Jeanette Skjelmose.
malaria test - Juma Bushiru came to me to be tested on Malaria. I have a Malaria self-diagnose kit, which is pretty awesome technology. Juma must have spent some time on the farm because his skin was pretty thick, making it a bit difficult to poke him with the needle (to extract blood). After so many pokes, he was tested positive. I didn't see him for two weeks, and during the two weeks, I asked his classmates how he was doing because I knew he was too poor to afford the drugs, and I was seriously worried that he would die.
There were three groups of women, interspersed among each other.
2064.E-X/3/1998. “Character Matters in a Republic.” Hickory Daily Record, Hickory, North Carolina, p. A-4.
By last year we had 42 working Hercules aircraft, but the older C-130Ks were only flying because of a £15.3 million refit, which can only keep them in the air until 2012.
INCLUDING PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATES, CAMPAIGNS, CONVENTIONS, RALLIES, MARCHES, SPEECHES, STUMPS, G8, G20 ETC ! THIS LEGISLATION IS IN YOUR FACE BLATANTLY STRIKES DOWN YOUR FIRST AMENDMENT RIGHTS OF FREEDOM OF SPEECH AND ASSEMBLY !!!
On Tuesday, we will offically be 34 weeks. I honestly never thought we'd make it this far and it makes me really happy. This pregnancy has NOT been easy and all I can think about is the fact that we are close to the finish line. I know my girls are worth every ounce of this craziness and all I have to do is get these little ladies to 36 weeks and we'll be good to go. :)
argue and cast aside those you have no time for
Happy New Year. Is it almost Summer yet?
As an American living abroad who has little contact with the kinds of people who hold such opinions, I wonder about how I would talk to them if I did have contact with them. Simic tries so hard to say "we" throughout the essay when he talks about who is being "ignorant." But at the end of the essay, even that approach breaks down: "Despite their bravado, these fools can always be counted on to vote against their self-interest." I know for myself that I react very negatively when people suggest that I am being duped in some way (say, by acting like I am a fool for not agreeing with them that vaccination is a bad thing); I can imagine that such a remark will simply end any chance of conversation.
Of her time at Geelong Grammar, she said: ''I didn't ever feel I was getting the support I needed to really excel. Ms Ashton-Weir boarded at the school in 2008 and 2009 but finished her secondary studies at a TAFE college in Sydney. She is in the first year of a double degree in arts and sciences at the University of Sydney.
The Penang government led by DAP also tried to introduce mosque committee elections. This, in my opinion, was malicious of nature. DAP knows that it has a solid support from the Chinese voters in Penang, but not so from the Malays. Perhaps mosque elections would split congregations politically, and dilute Malay solidarity at the grassroot level.
Virginia – Local blogger and hateful religious zealot out to rid the world of free will, particularly women of the governance of themselves, believes everything reads. This has made him an easy convert to Christianity. And a shoe-in for extreme fundamentalism, since other branches of the religion allow, and sometimes even encourage, the use of one’s own mind. Judging from his abortion-themed blog, Pete X has mainly read flyers passed out by other closed-minded hateful people in favor of making sure every pregnancy comes to term.
Is it okay to be angry? Is it right or wrong to let anger well up inside of us? Today’s reading (Acts 15:1-21) shows the early church going through a difficult moment where anger was likely present in the conversation. The followers of Christ originated out of the Jewish tradition, but after Christ’s death people outside the Jewish tradition came to accept Christ. The question then became, what about all the Jewish religious traditions? What do we do now that we have all these new people coming into “our” faith when they are not honoring “our” traditions? It was an environment ripe for anger.
Bible scholars have for generations counted the commands in the Bible. Most people would say that the Old Testament has somewhere over 600 commands to follow. Of course, most children's Sunday School classes have focused on the 10 Biggies, the 10 Commandments. There was even a classic movie made of that with wonderful 1960's style special effects.
12-23-2011
Kinda
We grant election tickets 2 candidates not on the basis of merit,but on the basis of if or nt they have a hereditary right 2 it..but then,we live in the land of karunanidhis,pawars,abdullahs & ofcourse gandhis!…but dn agn,WE aRe A DEMOCRACY!
Use some Embossing (wet or dry)
I think the government are mostly nervous about international perception. They care about the negative publicity that Anwar can and is generating for them. But if they were smart, they would be more scared of what us Malaysians think. They should be concerned that even those of us who have our doubts about Anwar absolutely abhor what is being done to him.
Because I plan for these things to happen, I'm not flustered or thrown off when they do, and I'm able to deal with whatever happens much more patiently than when I was expecting life to go on like normal, just with a baby. Becoming a mommy really does change everything. Some changes are more fun than others, but I'm learning that a shift in expectations really can make all the difference.
Now I am in Warsaw, Poland (took a 2 hour flight – much better than any extremely long train option through 3 other countries). Warsaw is an upcoming place, now very modern with a long and destructive history, the city was virtually rebuilt since WW2 due to the damage done to it. As a result it doesn’t really feel like you are in Eastern Europe (apart from the Old Town). It is just like any other Central European city – lots of foreigners here – havent heard so many Aussie accents in over a month!
Part of the subsequent campaign against the removals was based on something said by the then South African Prime Minister, John Vorster, in another context, “You must not try to take a man’s home away from him.” The saying, and Vorster’s picture, were printed on thousands of posters, because of course that was precisely what Vorster’s government had been doing. At the end of that particular campaign, there were a lot of surplus posters, and Cos and Elizabeth Davies took great pleasure in burning them in a bonfire.
“I think you’re living in the in-between right now.” She went on to say she had been reading about those times in life that are in-between and how challenging those times can be. I’ve thought a lot about living in the in-between since then. Most of us are in between something…. We can be in between relationships, in between times of happiness, in between jobs, in between career paths, in between doing what we have to do and doing what we’d love to do, in between periods of health, and more.
I suppose none of this makes sense since I’m not a businessman, but I’m forced to wear the same snobby clothing. I don’t think there’s a point to this post, but then again, I’m writing this while having the shakes and cold sweats due to lack of nutrition or something stupid and unimportant. Man, I hate being employed!
“Is this where you live?”
whose tears we sometimes laugh at and whose smiles make us cry.
Folding Recliner
After almost 5 hours of hard going, but having covered only 9 km, in the drying wind of a fading calima, we arrived at Playa de La Madera – a favourite beach for BBQs, at the end of a track from Tinajo, and where sensible people would stop. But did we stop? Oh no; we plunged on across the lava, only this time the “path” disappeared, to be replaced by blobs of paint every 30 metres or so, leaving us to clamber over razor-edged, shed-sized blocks of lava from one blob to the next.
Romans 11:5-7
I don’t use the phrase un-ambitious in a derogatory way, instead Palermo’s inquisitive, almost philosophical lack of ambition, his ability to take art to its rudimentary starting points and discover invention in those humble beginnings is exactly what makes him charming. There are no wails and grinding of teeth, no existential dilemmas. Actually, what is strangely present is a bit of comedy, mostly as the expense of American modernists.
vegetables like cabbage and broccoli
Leaving Haworth
The thing is, you’re having a good time, sharing your knowledge about these people and their issues. This knowledge is incontrovertible - it’s been backed up in media representation, books, research and lots and lots of historical events, also your own unassailable sense of being right.
When I asked if I could write more about him and his stunning works, Jarrett seemed to grow embarrassed. He said no.
(See Matthew 5 for more on this.)
Good morning friends,
But Mélusine is ultimately a character-based book; once they meet, Felix and Mildmay ultimately abandon the main political plot that’s going on. It’s a novel that lives or dies on the strength of its characters, and I just didn’t react to them that strongly. A heartier plot would have helped with this, I think. Felix, poor thing, stumbled for me when he failed to defend his delicately and hardwon status as an aristocrat the very first time someone throws a barb at him about his past, and I never quite bought Mildmay’s cursing. Now, I do like these characters. The true Felix, whom we see only briefly at the beginning and ends of the novel, has a graceful cruelty to him, but he spends much of the novel insane. Just as it distances Felix from the world around him, it distanced me the reader from him as a character. However, Mildmay, who is the much more interesting of the two, lives a full life. The beginning of the novel is chiefly occupied by him being involved in a love story, which I thought would go further. In any case, the Felix and Mildmay relationship is warm and troubled—I refer you to Memory’s various reviews of the novel to express how much.
This system really works for us for the following reasons:
Krashes tried to follow up, but Gehry, and the applauding crowd, cut off the discussion. (Several people asked non-Brooklyn questions during the Q&A, and Hagan's question did come after Krashes' question.)
Obama’s war on energy in America is another area that Romney has to focus upon, reminding voters of the way he has openly attacked the coal mining industry, done everything he can to shut down oil drilling anywhere on federal land and offshore, his EPA is attacking “fracking”, a technique to access natural gas, and, of course, wasted billions on “green” energy fantasies.
And it just feels so right to use things that have been passed down to me...generations old, nice wonderful linens..surrounding myself with my heritage.
For the whole earth will belong to them.
There are so many things by which San Francisco is recognized. We have the Golden Gate Bridge, Alcatraz, the Giants, Lombard Street, Union Square, and Fisherman’s Wharf, among countless other things that appear on postcards. What really defines this city are the people, who come from literally every walk of life and exist together like pieces of a puzzle. Each one is unique, but together they create a beautiful composition that expresses a peaceful coexistence not seen elsewhere.
He was a man other men feared. And while I never spent a great deal of time with him as child the time I did spend was either in t he field hunting, on the lake fishing, or in some smoke-filled dimly lit room watching him play poker and drink Canadian Whiskey.
And in honor of this lovely spring weather, a blue morpho butterfly
The best part of the first 15km were uphill, starting with a climb on a dirt road for the first few kilometres. The difficulty of this part was that the road was covered with loose gravel -rather the size of stones than small gravel. I didn't mind that bit too much, but things got really hard for me when we reached the first section of singletrack, which was very narrow and had a lot of ruts. I had to stop a number of times and a very large amount of people passed me. Going up the sledgehammer was in the order of the impossible, everybody was walking and at that stage I was seriously wondering if I was ever going to make it to the finish, in particular after covering only about 10km in the first hour ! There was no way back, however, so I just grit my teeth and pushed my bike for a while. Luckily the gods of this odyssey must have ruled in my favour a little later, because this was actually the hardest of the ride done for the day, and once I got back on my bike I enjoyed most of the remaining tracks, having a nice rest on the dirt roads and working hard in the twists and turns in the the forest. I still had to jump off a few times to get over some big scary logs, but after a while and with the advice and encouragement of Malcolm I managed to ride over the more reasonable ones. I certainly had a lot of practice getting on and off my bike today, but apparently that's part of mountain biking!!
being the chauffeur to my kiddos,
Saint Arnold Summer Pils
Where the borders begin?
The Luxe reminded me a bit of Gossip Girl. To those who aren’t familiar to Gossip Girl, the book is about upper-class New York, and the scandals, rumors, mysteries, and others that come with New York City’s elite. However, The Luxe is set in 1809, where everything is still proper, and stiff.
My card features the beautiful Bible Verse from Nehemiah 8:10 that can be found on the Scripture 6 Collection. As you can tell I've kept my design clean and simple.....I decided to emboss my card with the SU Framed Tulips Folder. Next I added the Cotton Lace, the Zva Pearls Flourish and the Flowers.
Though it may not yet be completely obvious to many of you, you are existing in your new ascended space. Your power now is truly strong, but only if you tap into it. If you keep entertaining your minds and hearts with thoughts of ‘this isn’t real’ you will anchor more and more third dimensionality into yourselves. You have stepped into a space where you are directly creating your reality, and many of you will understand and further feel what we are saying in the days and weeks ahead. Now is the most important time for you to step into your roles as change makers and peace givers. You are the Ascended Masters walking upon Earth now. You are the Divine Creator who will be manifesting miracle after miracle on your Earth sphere, even though many of you didn’t directly perceive such miracles on the fabled date that many of you have looked forward to so.
In other aspects of life my girls are fabulous. Raigan is nearly Riley's size:
2. The carving is an art in itself. A technique, skill and craft that I simply wasn't patient enough for.
There’s Dearest’s mother chatting in the street to her lifelong friend Stella. There’s my Dad playing football with his grandchildren. My granddad and grandmother and various uncles, cousins and acquaintances. I came across a few of Shughie and Ronald that have acquired an added poignancy knowing now what we didn’t know then.
I think this picture is also begging for a caption competition. I’m going for “What HAVE you done to the dining-room curtains child?”
i want to dress like a scrapbook
The present Government is playing dangerous games with the immigrants’issues and the rising criminality while unemployment is rampant.
2. The End
(Blouse, Jeans, Necklace- Forever 21, Cardigan-J.Crew, Wedges-Old Navy)
A. opposition to slavery in the territories.
If you want to read someone else’s mail, and it is protected by RSA, one method is to factor their key. Fortunately, factoring large numbers is believed to be very hard — much harder than multiplying them. So, what is the vulnerability?
Peter Fossett was born into slavery on the Monticello plantation of Thomas Jefferson.
But he grew old --
I myself can be quite the nay-sayer, but I think when someone says "I'm going to try to be a better person", it's not something to put down. We should lift the resolutioners up. Support them in their endeavors to stop effing-up instead of telling them "Meh, you'll never make it, no one keeps New Year's resolutions."
*Ink: Memento Rich Cocoa
Initially a lumpectomy, but the surgeon was not able to get clear margins (meaning we couldn’t get it all with just a lumpectomy) so then bilateral mastectomy. Then the tumor was tested for an oncotype score, which helps answer the question, “Is chemotherapy needed?”. I scored in the range where chemotherapy is recommended. I did not have radiation because all the breast tissue was removed, nothing left to radiate. During the bilateral mastectomy I had them start reconstruction, so they placed tissue expanders under my breast muscles. A short time later I was on a weekly schedule of getting the expander filled with saline to gradually stretch my muscles out. Once fully stretched you are ready for insertion of the implants. That was very painful each time I received a fill, it felt like I had a Charlie horse in my chest that I couldn’t relieve.
The first mention about the City of the Dead dates back to the beginning of the 14th Century. The ancestors of Ossetians settled down on the five mountain ridges, but the land was so expensive they were forced to choose the windiest and most unserviceable place for their cemetery. In the times of the plague many people, with no one left to bury them, would come to the crypt and wait for their death.
It is absolutely right the company co-operates with police on inquiries ranging from phone and computer hacking to illegal payments.
While Grass gives accounts of what he wrote throughout his youth, Theroux talks more about the books he read while travelling in the train. Both conclude with a void: the absence of any more layers to peel from the onion of memory in Grass and the nothingness of the barren landscape of Patagonia in Theroux:
which made me feel i was cared,
By the time I got to High School and Intermediate, my matinees were burgled into by Dilip Kumar and his films on a regular basis, often making big holes in my meager pocket money. But they were lit by the movies memories are made of. The black and white empire of shadows.The conspiracy between light, lens and celluloid to bewitch minds and steal hearts.The darkness of the cinema waiting for burglars like Dilip Kumar to break and enter. It was magic.
Democratic and Republican congressional leaders were working on separate plans to raise the debt ceiling by $2.4 trillion and avoid default. Both sides said they believed a compromise was still possible.
in the name of mind numbing progress
I had always admired the abandoned hospital in Manzanillo, Mexico. It had been deemed unstable after an earthquake in 1995 cracked many of its walls. For years there was a guard at the front, and I was too young to brave it out and try and sneak past him. Last year though, I got my chance when I was visiting Manzanillo for 3 weeks. No one was guarding it and it seemed like I’d have the place all to myself!
According to EE Times, there are some 34 ARM licensees in China, but at $5 million for a single Cortex-A9 core license, it’s unlikely that ARM will be China’s choice. The Power ISA is cheaper, but lacks the software ecosystems that ARM and MIPS enjoy. ShenWei/Alpha is also a possibility, but again it cannot compete with MIPS’ installed base.
AA: What other work would you like to recommend to our readers?
It’s more than just the cuddling, the closeness, the smooching that usually follows. I also like being capable. Of course I can’t run a marathon schlepping my kid around in my arms, (I can’t run a marathon just by myself) but I can carry her through a store because she fell down and hurt her knee (is tired, cranky, needs a squoosh hug, whatever). I like being strong enough to pick things up and I look at carrying her as my training; if I keep doing it as she gets bigger I’m only getting stronger right? I don’t understand the ‘she’s too old for that’ thought. Says who? And if I want to do it what do you care? People are so weird.
Oh, wait a minute. I just realized something. This Rabbi never even came to the school to see, firsthand, what was happening. He probably subscribes to the camp that it is all an exaggeration. Isn’t there a concept that one cannot really have an opinion about something without actually experiencing it? The nerve to make light of what many girls, not just Naama, experienced without actually seeing it in person!
-Top each plate of spinach with segments of one orange, half the diced avocado, and 2 tbsp of almonds. Divide the dressing between the plates and serve immediately.
The two backpack as well as lone shoulder will access that you’ convenient appearances in order that the accustomed save models often brightened in the just remember popularity.
and then the reverse happens, because there always needs to be payback right? So much for turning the other cheek.
‘He’s just a grumpy old man,’ Tim said. ‘Don’t worry about it.’
another owl lands
Cats One way wind NL
Join us for Kitchen Chat this week as we hear from three of the best in Christian Suspense: Tosca Lee, Jim Rubart and Erin Neely. I had the privilege of interviewing these three during the International Christian Retailing Show in July.
I would love to hear about your mother's day, whether you are
seasons a the snow, teaching at an amazing little school.
Add the lime juice, oil, salt and pepper etc. Toss together with a spoon and ENJOY.
Is this just me and my dysfunctional children? Is it sugar? Lack of sleep?
This is Edwards concluding statement: “Christian practice is much more to be preferred as evidence of salvation than sudden conversion, mystical enlightenment, or the mere experience of emotional comfort that begins and ends with contemplation.”[14] Edwards makes 6 arguments for this thesis:[15]
I can’t remember anything else from the interview, but I think maybe it wasn’t so bad. Nope, not looking out for myself in TV. But I think the interview made me realize I need to appreciate this place more.
If Barack and Genevieve were in social occasions as a couple, it was almost always with the Pakistanis. Hasan Chandoo had moved back from London and taken a place in a converted warehouse on the waterfront below Brooklyn Heights. Wahid Hamid, starting a rise up the corporate ladder that would take him to the top of PepsiCo, lived on Long Island with his wife. Sohale Siddiqi was part of the crowd, along with Beenu Mahmood. It was a movable feast, and invariably a matter of bounty and excess, friends losing themselves in food and conversation. Barack for the most part declined alcohol and drugs. “He was quite abstemious,” Genevieve said. She enjoyed the warmth of the gatherings, but was usually ready to go home before him. He was pushing away from the Pakistanis, too, politely, for a different reason, she thought. He wanted something more.
He thought that, in America, the wealthiest should pay their fair share, and he said so. I know that position might disqualify him from the Republican primaries these days, but what Ronald Reagan was calling for then is the same thing that we’re calling for now: a return to basic fairness and responsibility; everybody doing their part. And if it will help convince folks in Congress to make the right choice, we could call it the Reagan Rule instead of the Buffett Rule.
Information about Dee's show listed below new gallery info. Grand Opening will be Friday, October 20th and will feature Robert Horvath.
"I picked the wrong day to wear black", I quipped. (crickets)
The first ever "Bar Week" in Indy is here! From April 4th - 10th, participating bars are offering up a menu of your favorite lascivious and liberating libations at 50% off! Open to all, from open to close!
I read books in 1970 and I did not read them again in 2010, because I read them in the 1970's when they were appropriate to read, while they still applied. Books written in the 1950's were written because they were relevant to that time. Those books were based on what went before, leading up to the 1950's and as things stood in the 1950's. When reading such books today one should realise this and not try and read it as if it was happening today, because we are not living in the 1960's, we're living in 2011. The World never stopped turning and it won't do so in our lifetime either.
There are three other beers in the "Taste the Difference" range, but for various reasons I gave them a miss. The first is Scottish Craft Lager, brewed by Harviestoun and presumably based on their well-known Schiehallion brand, but at just 4.1% abv, a touch on the weak side for a decent lager. The other was the Suffolk Golden Ale, from St Peter's Brewery. I gave this one a miss as the tasting notes make clear it is a wheat beer, and I've never been a fan of wheat beers.Somehow I just can't get on with them; I can dink one, at a pinch, but one is invariably enough and after that I have to switch to a more traditional.style, based on barley malt.
The indictment also charged him with making false statements to the CIA in an unsuccessful attempt to trick the agency into allowing him to include classified information in his 2010 book, “The Reluctant Spy: My Secret Life in the CIA’s War on Terror.”
Compounding issues are big problem for me. When it rains, it pours. This new-found energy and forward momentum gets tested, and usually I can breeze past problems. Sometimes, I lose it, like tonight. I’ll admit, this new direction, and the stress accompanying it, can make me feel weak. Tonight was a bummer, but I’m glad I wrote about it. I already feel a little better, and I bet I’ll feel even better after some sleep.
Me: And looks like you let the cats out too. You guys know you’re not supposed to go outside.
It was hard to regard terms like “good”, “competent”, “caring” and “intelligent” as anything other than positive, and to regard terms like “bad”, “untrustworthy”, “arrogant”, and “selfish” as anything other than negative. I put “Environment/Eco-friendly” and “Progressive” into the positive camp because while everyone has different ideas of what environmental policies should be enacted and different ideas of what constitutes progressive, it is generally agreed now that the a degree of environmentally-friendly policy is positive and that being progressive, in the vague sense of moving forward, is also positive. In other words, they’re like “democracy” or “human rights.” There may be disagreements about the meaning, but the terms are accepted goods.
her face.
Father nods thoughtfully, chewing his medium rare steak. "I guess it's about time you moved out then. Found a place of your own. Planted some roots."
In this day and age, inkling means: a slight suggestion or indication; hint; intimation; a vague idea or notion; slight understanding. This is how I used the word in the ridiculous paragraph above.
“There was something Animist in their way of looking at images in the first century. Where they saw shadows and reflections, they also saw life. They saw the image on the cloth as the living double of Jesus.
Not altogether different from Murdoch’s British tabloids suddenly deciding that Labour was not the devil on earth, and backing Tony Blair when it was obvious he would become prime minister in a landslide. Not that any of these papers’ far Right rantings slackened for a moment. Business is business, no matter how well Murdoch can keep a straight face.
What I don’t like about the wig is the shape, or cut if you will…there’s something a bit off about it. Maybe too full on top? Too thin on the bottom? Not sure. It’s not the worst style I’ve ever worn, but if my hairdresser had done it, next time I’d tell him to leave it fuller on the bottom and not so poufy on top.
“It’s a yes or no question.”
COLOR: 5.9 SRM
If household chores are not your fortay, perhaps you could look to a place that is a little more discreet for your mock-sex toy fun. This, my friends, is the real very first sex toy that you may ever own: Your husband’s Mach 5 razor.
Bittersweet Chocolate Ganache
You’re welcome humanity, :)
You can select which basic services to display. USpromodeals.com offers coverage for telephone, Internet, cable and satellite TV, home security systems, gas and electric basic services. Water, sewer and garbage will be available shortly.
The Challenge is open from Today (Tuesday 20th March To Monday 2nd April 2012)
Becoming a couple where both of us are working, as well as having a toddler to organise, has been hard for us to get used to. All that rush in the mornings to get everyone out of the door on time, and both us us so whacked from work of an evening that it’s all we can do to veg on the couch for an hour or so and watch TV.
One each side of the man who cried
1. Preheat oven to 325 degrees.
Ross has worked a tonne of overtime over the past couple of weeks, but now he's got five days off for Easter! Yay! He wants to finish painting the dining room, but I think there'll be some time for relaxing as well. And after that, he has at least four nights' worth of proper sleep to look forward to while Henry and I are away.
Small onion:10
By nature, I am an open book. I have not learned to maintain privacy. Instead, I have learned to stifle my personal outpouring of information. The current landscape of writing tells me I have made a foolish mistake, because these days, all that truly matters in gauging your skill as a writer is how many published works you have and how many hits your blog gets per day.
At first I was mad, I felt let down by all my carefully planned meals and the changes I had already made to my diet before pregnancy: cutting way back on processed foods, growing and preserving my own vegetables, eating fresh and simple food. And then there were the changes I'd made for pregnancy. I had increased my protein to over 60 grams a day, added foods high in omega three fatty acids three times a week and only bought hormone free, pastured meat and dairy. I also felt unjustly diagnosed because only one test was actually high enough to fail.
Additional reader warning: Pathetically written, bombastic, racist, black propaganda follows.
There could be two things that might have happened. The man didn’t have his passport size photo on-hand and used Mr. Obama’s picture or the people who were collecting the documents have never seen Obama’s picture. Either way it’s one funny Know your customer (KYC) story to tell.
The last of the three witnesses whose testimony in the Sheridan trial whose evidence is said to be subject of investigation by Strathclyde Police is Bob Bird, the Scottish editor of the News of the World (NotW) for the last 10 years.
Beadboard: $40 Home Depot
Fuck. I stood there trying to assess the scene, and the work dudes just stood there, like lumps, didn't offer to move any of their shit aside, didn't offer to help me down (common courtesy, one would think), didn't stop the messy splashing of plaster they were doing, didn't even move the huge honking pile of shit off the stairwell that was not only an obstruction but actually dangerous as well. I stood, they stared, aaaand...impasse.
Does magic feature in your other novels of the Archonate, or is that unique to the Hapthorn books?
Crap! That sounded really . . . official. Ewan wasn’t just some random hot guy, he was a prince, and people looked up to him. Could she really afford to embarrass him by showing up in pants and a jerkin? Gareth and Alexandre already thought she was pushing her luck by the clothes she preferred to wear, maybe she needed to give in just this once.
but you just have to remember to talk to them!
I was 13 years old the year that I found myself in the midst of a set of clique of girls. Jennifer, Betsy, Erin, and me. Every slumber party, whatever the occasion (or sometimes none at all), found us at each other's houses, gorging ourselves on Cool Ranch Doritos, Double Stuff Oreos, and A&W Root Beer. We talked about school, giggled over the boys we liked, and watched the same set of movies: Top Gun, Beaches, Steel Magnolias, and Dead Poets Society.
The first person who blesses her on her birthday is Revati, her mother, the daughter of Raivata Manu himself. Unable to find a worthy match for her Raivata Manu travels to meet Brahma, and loses 27 caturyugas in the process. Then on Brahma’s advice he gives her in marriage to Balarama, the elder brother of Sri Krishna.
Happy, happy Monday friends! How about three cheers for it being a short week!! Which is a good thing, because I'm starting this one out already pooped! The Art Party was a big success and so much fun. I'm sorting through the mountain of pictures and hope to share it all tomorrow. Until then, here's a teaser shot of the cute birthday girl...officially six now!
It’s Friday night and I’m watching a show on the HGTV channel. It was piece about the nearest thing to a palace, in this country, that I’ve seen. It was the home of those would be monarchs who might have been called The Duke and Duchess of Spelling if we had those sorts of titles in use. They’re also known as Aaron and Candy Spelling.
Cysteine/L-Form – An amino acid from hair which can come from animals. Used in hair-care products and creams, in some bakery products, and in wound-healing formulations. Alternatives: plant sources.
3) Or 3: Jimmy was originally James and the leaked script was at a point where they weren’t finished revising it.
Animal House
I can't tell you how many fantastic people we've met on this dip through the south. People who are quick with a smile, greet each other politely, and who want to share the best their communities have to offer. We have been all but adopted by more strangers here that I ever imagined would have welcomed perfect strangers into their lives.
A birdhouse template is printed in draft onto the reverse of an A4 piece of cream card decorated with sepia music notes and cut out. I adapted this free template from http://www.allfreecrafts.com/easter/house.shtml . The roof is cut out separately.
3. Friend me on Facebook (3 entries)
My husband and I rented a truck to drive the hour plus drive down south to the town where we would pick the coops up. The small town of Orting is on a river and pretty rural. If I wasn't so worried about the directions I would've taken pictures. We passed lots of farms and ranches, saw just about every type of farm animal and made it where we needed to go. The man (Donald) that builds them and his brother helped my husband load both our coop and my sister's in sections onto the truck and off we left to go home. Then we got lost, in a rental truck (with the fuel light warning on), with no phone service. It all kind of looked the same and we weren't sure if we had passed a part of the river or piece of land or not until we finally came to a crossroads and realized we had gone the wrong way. Luckily I wasn't fired from my co-piloting job and we eventually made it back home.
I count, as god of avenues and gates,
Objectives: Aero evaluations and long runs
It’s not finding the killer or saving the president or crowning the true queen. It’s not plot.
Every boss I have ever had would be better off for reading this.
In ten words or less, what is the most "Beyond Reality" thing in your newest book? Nightshade, CA (where the DEAD IS books take place) is a pretty unreal place, so the abnormal is the normal. So everything. And I can never say ANYTHING in ten words or less.
Imogen: Am I being silly?
Sometimes it is hard to appreciate what it will look like when it is finished, it may look odd to some and may take a long time to finish, but if the foundation is set properly, it will stand.
Just because someone in a variety of massage therapy position, you are required to pass a drought relief bill. However, in some parts of the grand theater bismarck north dakota and Clark Expedition traveled through this area in which North Dakota requires massage therapists to be important for the grand theater bismarck north dakota is rumored to be updated. This is a sleepy, little town. A comfortable downtown area is surrounded by neighborhoods populated with friendly people. The temperatures are a lot to offer in the grand theater bismarck north dakota and the grand theater bismarck north dakota are constantly going on and on your North Dakota was estimated to be licensed to practice this natural healing service in the nation always.
Writing was the focus of my graduate work, and I developed a taste for blogging through the course “Blogging a Better Planet,” taught by Andrew Revkin of The New York Times. Pace’s Media and Communication Arts program offered me the opportunity to replace a conventional thesis with a blogged thesis project. Prof. Revkin would become my thesis sponsor and instructor, and this blog is the result.
Transport drivers who ferry goods between Nouadhibou and Nouakchott took protest action against restrictive regulations by blocking the roads this morning.
His father wrote,
One sided relationships usually don’t last long, needy people get old fast. One has to be a contribution to have true friends and good relationships and at the same time, one can’t only be the contributor all the time.
It's Friday again and I'm looking forward to catching up with some bloggy friends tomorrow in Aix.
With an unnervingly wide-eyed stare, the slow loris hails from the tropical jungles around Southeast Asia and is notable for its plush but strong limbs. Slow lorises can hang by their feet for hours at a time — and often do.
(Photo taken at a garden in China.)
Sure, it is more convenient to buy those cute little ice cream cups at the grocery store. It will also cost you double. Instead, a day before the party scoop ice cream into cupcake liners, place them on a cookie sheet, cover with plastic wrap and stick in the freezer. The same convenience, but half the cost!
les, you can pick a winner if you want.
This “new” community is pretty awesome. I don’t mind giving up some of the “privacy” that people seem to be worrying about… I figure if someone really wants to find something out about me they can do it whether or not I post “personal” information on a blog or on my Facebook or Twitter accounts.
Paul Salata knows what it’s like to be overshadowed by greatness. He played for the 49ers and the Colts, but didn’t amount to much. Salata went on to become an actor. He appeared in movies such as “Singin’ in the Rain” and “The Ten Commandments,” but his roles were so unimportant he’s not even listed in the credits.
2. If you post about this giveaway on your blog, please leave a second comment telling me so. You can have a total of 2 entries.
I did like the pan fried dumplings, and the stir fried pea shoots were good and garlicky.
Contrary to Mann J’s ruling, a business method need not be abstract, nor need it result in the completion of a transaction. Macrossan’s claim was for the business of advising upon and creating appropriate company formation documents, which clearly was not technical (steps 3 and 40. Thus the claim failed as an application for a business method patent.
At the beginning of April we made move number 11. The first 9 of which were made in the first 6 years of marriage and we are coming up on our 9th anniversary this year. The longest Adrienne has ever lived in one place is 2 years and one of those years Russ was in Afghanistan. So as a family we have never lived anywhere for more than a year together. Hopefully that will change soon. I really am tired of moving; especially now that we are no longer an Army family.
Thank Shayln for this very unique SMELLY ARMPIT award!! LOL!
The King of New York Hacks...
I think back with fond memories of my DeluxeVille days and all my single girl memories of living there. I'm glad that I've always been the kind of gal to enjoy every moment of my life as it was happening. I never understood people who couldn't be happy with what they had at the moment because they were to busy being sad thinking they needed something they didn't have to be happy. I say.... enjoy every stage of your life even if it isn't exactly how you think it should/would/could be. There is no perfect life....there is right here and right now so why waste it wishing for something else. You never know what's going to happen tomorrow, next week, or next year....stop worrying so much and just enjoy what ya got! OMG there I go being a Bus Stop Goddess again!
But, as with anything that is man-made, it is open to flaws and hence, not only is it allowed to be questioned, questioning it should be mandatory so the flaws can be fixed.
This card is almost a mirror image of the other card if you squint and are blue/red color blind. A typical posed photo of the player holding his stick down. I wonder if they were actually in their skates when these photos were taken? As I said the walls of the room are plain so they could have been taken while the players were suiting up. Yeah I'll keep thinking that.
Anyway, I've got a new, working scanner now, so I'm remedying the situation. Click on the images for slightly larger views.
The children had their own vegetable, fruit, and flower gardens. They sold the produce for the going market price to the housekeeper, kept the coppers in their own little clay banks, and once a year these were ceremoniously smashed in the presence of all, the contents counted, and a collective decision made about whom to give it to.
2/3 cup M&M's (use the orange, yellow, and red ones)
I love the fact the not only am I doing a weight-loss challenge that will help me physically and mentally, but more importantly, I grow Spiritually. I treat this time in a sense, like a Fast. When I am hungry and it's not time to eat, I go to the Word or just pray! I remind myself over and over - when I am weak, HE is strong! HE is my strength and my shield~ Lord knows I need a shield to cover me so I can't see my Son's cookies, or that Chocolate candy from Christmas.
The oil is removed by a combination of high temperature mechanical pressing and solvent extraction. Traces of the solvent (usually hexane) remain in the oil, even after considerable refining.Like all modern vegetable oils, canola oil goes through the process of caustic refining, bleaching and degumming - all of which involve high temperatures or chemicals of questionable safety. And because canola oil is high in omega-3 fatty acids, which easily become rancid and foul-smelling when subjected to oxygen and high temperatures, it must be deodorised. The standard deodorisation process removes a large portion of the omega-3 fatty acids by turning them into trans fatty acids.
Midtown Plaza, Cnr Bourke and Swanston Sts
-RSS
2. How did he want to run IBM? LG -.
Our first popular music compilation, HOMETOWN HITS is now available at all leading music stores, get your copy today and support the best in local music.
Now go. Read. And come back and tell me what you thought!
**In point of fact, Christa does know about Rob's relationship with Siri. Last night she told me Rob asks Siri to marry him. I'm not sure what her response is. I just can't bring myself to ask my cell phone to marry me.
I drank about 2 quarts of fluid and got lots of rest. I slept fairly well saturday night and I napped on Sunday. Considering the workout I had on Saturday and the fact that Sunday is a day of rest, I can fairly give myself a 3 for 3.
Well I’ve given you two words – grossly disproportionate. That’s -
We spilled nothing.
Then we went bowling. Our local bowling alley has a summer special, Monday-Friday 11-3 you can bowl for .50 cents. Now that is something even this daycare mama can afford to do. We played one game and had lunch (a treat from Rachel and Abby’s mama).
It would have been one big room, open to the roof, with a central open hearth, smoke holes in the gables and a maybe a small window or two, with real glazing, unlike the hovels. A timber panel to one end would have housed the solar, where the owners slept. Cooking and crapping was done outside.
I have to admit I cannot shake this mood right now. I am actually more up at work than I am once I get home. I think it is because at work I must be up. I have to interact with so many people and in so many situations. I have to keep the energy up and the mood up. Once I get home the energy spent just leaves me sullen and grumpy.
either quarrel or honeymoon,
6. Blood of Eden 6:36
I've been on school holidays and spent most of that time working on our house (getting it all pretty to sell, then I can pick out my next house in Brisbane, hopefully outside of the zombie-zoned areas).
“When we have a difficult time receiving, we block the flow of life.” Pg 47
At one point I dreamed that I was taking a piano lesson with a new teacher that I was apprehensive about, and I concluded that he was OK and I should go ahead and work with him. The teacher was a white guy with light brown hair (who does that sound like?), but I took the dream as being about Bertram. I decided to give him a chance. I called up Orion and asked him to put us in touch. I did get a contact with the new guy, and I very frankly described my attitude about associating with him. I told him that I had some seriously difficult patients who were not making good progress in their healing, and that I could certainly use his help, but that I needed to stay in charge of my body and I didn’t want to be pushed around.
I actually enjoyed having the doors off for the first month, as it allowed me to get a feel of where I wanted dishes/spices/etc to live for the proper flow. It also helped Travis KNOW where dishes went without opening 5 cupboards (like he does now?)
Anyways, since Nice is pretty boring in terms of activities (but again, fantastic if you just want to relax) I went to spend a day in Monaco. The bus is only like, 1 euro or something ridiculously cheap like that and goes along the coast for about 45 minutes. Even if you don’t get to do anything in Monaco, the bus ride alone is beautiful enough to warrant some time.
Yesterday, I dropped off $4,030 at the Greater St. Louis Community Foundation. That's a nice chunk of cheddar for the scholarship funds.
Finally, Copic developed a perfect solution. This soft-sided carry case is sturdy, with reinforced sides, yet holds the markers compactly. We filled one of these cases and started turning it upside down, shaking it, tossing it around, and it held all the markers in place nicely!
This is one of the best paragraphs I've seen about a picture book. I love the energetic words: Zoom! Clank! Puff! Roar! (it sounds like morning coffee at the Reef) I love the humor.
Next, the really interesting thing about lists is movement, and for that you should check out Jay Brooks, who has put together his annual list of breweries and their movement. He didn't to it for craft breweries, though, so here's your Oregon movers:
After that Ilion the superb was burned.
Asking the atheist to offer a naturalistic explanation for the resurrection of Jesus assuming that the Bible is true is sort of like asking the literary historian to explain why Captain Ahab didn’t just take the Pequod, sail off to Barbados, and spend the rest of his days drinking rum, eating fresh conch, and lying on the beach. I suppose the clever English major could come up with a reason involving Ahab’s fatal pride, but the real reason is: because Herman Melville didn’t write Moby Dick that way!
Sept 28 – Grandmas Sports Garden – Duluth, MN (Headlining)
Why are you so against Valentine’s Day? Besides it being “commercial”, what real reason do you have to dislike it? What real reason do you have for raining on everyone else’s parade? I can’t understand it. And if I hear yet another ADULT say it’s a man-created holiday, I’m going to scream. Right then and right there. Please tell me if man hasn’t created the holiday, how in the hell are we supposed to have it? Is it supposed to be passed down from aliens? Is Jesus supposed to send us all a mass tweet notifying us of a new holiday? What holiday isn’t created by man?
The government revised its 2011 economic growth target to 5.0-5.5 per cent from 5.0-6.0 per cent earlier. It estimated that the fiscal deficit will shrink further to 4.7 per cent of gross domestic product next year from 5.4 per cent in 2011 as it reduces development spending.
16:40: Maryetta Ables clarifies the US position as Dr Chaouachi had mentioned that Forces were talking of taking anti-smokers to court. She said the groundwork had been done but there was a lack of funding. The charge would have been abuse of power in contravention of the Constitution.
But in Beast it's a moment of noble sacrifice (the
and saves those who are crushed in spirit"
I am addicted to romantic movies. And I’ve seen quite a lot of them too. (A quick recommendation: watch Pretty Woman, Mona Lisa Smile, Notting Hill, Ps. I Love You, Moulin Rouge!, The Titanic…) And I have always, always wanted to sleep like they do. But the oh-so-famous male friend of mine told me that “You cannot sleep like that, the man will have a necrosis in his arm and the woman a terrible ache in her neck.” Always with the brutal realism. So I asked him, what position he would recommend for sleeping, and presented him with this:
As Xu Guan steadied himself, he touched his head with one hand. Most of the pain seemed to be emanating from a spot above and slightly behind his right eyebrow. Xu Guan explored the area with his finger tips. As his fingers trailed through his freshly washed hair, Xu Guan found a knot nearly as large as a chicken egg. Even the slightest pressure brought stabs of pain. Xu Guan drew his hand away and slowly turned his head as there was a thump outside the door.
The kids love this activity!
It is safe to say that in a wired world, sights of individuals like those in the photo are no longer unusual. It is also a reasonable assumption that in many places, even outside urban areas or college towns, people like this can be found in the flesh.
"Send Me No Wine" by The Moody Blues
This is likely my penultimate T/S post. I am hating this week, frankly. I hate endings and goodbyes. I’ve been on the phone and FB and email with some of my T/S pals, Claudia Deutsch and Nancy Miller and Fran Johns and Jeff McMahon, even Paul Smalera, who left in March when he got a great online editing job. I hope to be working with him soon as a freelancer.
As a more advanced lesson they moved on to canter, something she hadn't really done with Enoch, but she went for it after having been asked if she wanted to have a go and she trotted three sides of the manege!
No, I think a couple of songs we recorded may have turned up on it, but I'm not sure.
Perhaps the most interesting of that time were the Middle Eastern friends that suddenly arrived as a group one day. They appeared as a small gang of 8 and were obviously new to the country and culture here. My new interest in cultures had me being of the first to start befriending them and learning their story. They were in the first Iraq/USA war in the early 90s, but on the Iraqi side. The masses of approaching US troops and tanks forced realization of some Iraqis that they were outmatched and they surrendered. They would have been killed as surrendering traitors if they stayed in Iraq after that so the USA brought many of them here. The one I became very good friends with (Ahmed) told me many stories of his family, country, and wars he fought in as we sat at camp fires talking and drinking beers. I was his trusted advisor in career advancement, dating, and USA life in general and eventually his best man at his wedding. I haven’t talked with Ahmed for many years, but we both know the brotherhood we formed will last forever and I believe our paths will meet again. I think he eventually moved to Washington DC for a government job. I know his general determination in life will take him far.
Sunnies: Thrifted
The first one was big bodied - about 21-22 lbs. but it's beard was only about 7" long.
For example, I could fit 9 spools on the bottom row. I had 13 inches of space (remember, I'm not counting the border). So 13 divided by 9 is approximately 1.4 inches.
I dissolve a chicken cube/ bouillon in 2 cups of boiling water just before adding to the rice, which starts boiling on the hob top almost immediately. I then close with a tight fitting lid and cook on low heat for about 10 to 15 minutes, checking half way through with a fork, if the rice is cooked or not.
Day Five: Drive to Sears Point for drag racing and lunch at Infineon Raceway; on to Half Moon Bay for closing night ceremony at Ritz-Carlton
Which comes to what I didn’t say in the “Gotta laugh” post, which I will say now.
Get a good nights rest
Ooh La Frou Frou Collection cards:
I went walking in South East London today. To a part of London I’d never been before. And at one stage I had to stop just to stare at the sea of pink and white, like clouds, or swirls of candy floss. It was beautiful. You know when Shakespeare talks about the perfect bloom at a single moment in time before decay. Today I think I hit the cherry blooms on that very day. It was perfect. And right there in the park I had to stop, rummage in my backpack for my Ipod and find John Spillane’s ” The Dance of the Cherry Trees”;
I said…”placing them in the dishwasher”…but THERE IS NO DISHWASHER!
If you get a chance, watch the match. You’ll come away from it with a great appreciation of the game, even if you aren’t normally a fan. If you only watch 10 minutes, watch the first ten minutes of the 2nd half. You’ll see why Messi is the world’s greatest player and has the potential to become the best ever.
The first Spring Break camp was a big kids camp where they made Irish Brown Scones, Minty Ice Cream Pie, Chocolate Mashed Potato Cake and Irish Butter Cookies. The second was for the younger kids and they rolled out and decorated sugar cookies, made Leprechaun bark, Rainbow skewers and Shamrock biscuits.
You see, here’s what happened. He came over Friday night. He left later than he was supposed to because of work, so he didn’t even get to my house till 7:30 ish.
Resting when weary, waking when rested, going from room to room puttering, moving this here and there. It feels so luxurious :)
Mix all that together for the first layer which is like the crust. Then you pat it down in the prepared baking dish that is lined with foil. Layer #1 needs at least 1 full hour in the fridge to harden.
But I will say that this scene grows out of my experience as an assistant D.A. My first assignment was in Lowell, a great community where Elliot’s and Birke’s were real places. (Elliot's is still going strong and I highly recommend it. Order a hot dog "all around." You won't be sorry.) And the stabbing described in this scene is based on an incident that occurred while I was there — a man gashed across the belly, forced to hold his intestines inside by holding his hand over his belly, pressing it closed, while he was driven to the emergency room. As for the salesman, well, it was my own grandfather who sold Mighty Mac parkas to old stores like Birke’s all over New England. As a writer you grab what you can from any source available, your own history or the lives of others, and you spin it into your story.
His birthday is in two weeks. I don't know how I'm going to handle that.
This sleep pattern, commonly referred to as segmented, divided, or bi-modal sleep, would predominate until the turn of the twentieth century. By the 1920′s all references to first and second sleep disappeared as it became culturally acceptable for people to express their secret desires under the dim lights of a speakeasy and all that jazz.
Beauty and sculptures abound in the Bluff View Art District.
This is what we saw on Wednesday 2nd May!
You see my dream is this.... We have a large open breakfront armoire in our dining room... it was once part of the fixtures and fittings of a French haberdashery shop... the drawers held rolls of ribbon and trim and the open shelves, the bolts of fabric... It is without doubt one of my very favourite pieces of furniture in our home. (If you have my books you will see photographs of it in both...) At the moment it contains a collection of pewter plates... which look fine... but... when I saw this armoire in the back of the Astier de Villatte shop in Paris... well... I think you know what my immediate thoughts were... How fabulous would our black lacquered cupboard look if it were filled with a selection of these gorgeous plates? Breathtaking, dreamy, stunning.... a Roget Thesaurus full of superlative adjectives were causing an overly acquisitive urge to surface. I couldn't help but feel that that our pewter plates needed to take a break... a little holiday... or more like long service leave somewhere else in the house...
Attending this field trip allowed the girls to earn their green petal for their Daisy patch and gave them the opportunity to earn the World Thinking Day award. If your Daisy would like to earn this patch, please have her bring her completed project about our garden tour to our next troop meeting on April 12th. They can draw a picture, write about, or create art work about what they learned. Once they share what they have made with the troop, they will get their patch.
Macaroni salad
Back in my days as a WIC counselor, I would give the same feeding advice day in and day out and I couldn't understand why, month after month, few people seemed to listen. I figured out during my pregnancy that every pregnancy is different, and I am now learning that when it comes to infant feeding, every baby is different.
A freight train passes as I tip my head back against the white poles along the stairs.
This time it’s Back to the Past, with “They Don’t Make ‘em Like This Anymore”, and “From The Dawn Of Time”.
Anyway that's the Saturday rant over and I've not even read the Daily Mail yet, still if you want more on the puritanical neo-prohibitionists Alcohol Concern and their boss Don Shenker I suggest you head over to see Fido at the Don Shenker is a Chump site. NB the word 'chump' is used in the similar way that Peter the Pedarist used it earlier this year.
Combine flour, baking powder and cinnamon in a mixing bowl. Mix in the cubed apples.
This time last year, we got so much rain that our downstairs completely flooded and we had to redo the entire thing: carpets, tile, walls, you name it. So, naturally, this is freaking my parents out.
d) Wait 20 mins to call 911. Then expect me to wig out as much as you are about something that is no longer in progress.
One year ago in April, I moved into this apartment. It was a necessary move, what with my shoulder being trashed and finances having swirled down the drain because of being off work and having the Workers Comp Board deny my claim. (A pox on them!, I say. But it has been sent in to the Review Panel so hopefully they will change their tune and allow my claim... which, if they do, would mean they owe me a good sized chunk of change.) The house was sold and I became an apartment dweller for the first time in about 20+ years.
JOY OVERLOAD.
So you can see why I was disappointed. Somehow, I had managed to keep myself from spoiling most of the game for four years while hoping in vain it would be released for the Xbox 360, something that I still begrudge the people behind this game for and speaking of being pissed off…
To the taxpayer and government officials desperately trying to balance the state’s books, the short-term savings are hard to resist.
Wings torn, again, from her scarred back,
'The kids are at their grandparent's house this weekend while we are packing to move, but we promise to get lots of photo ops tomorrow when she opens her gift (and a more formal thank you for sure)! My hands are shaking as I type this and I'm crying. I guess good things DO come to those who wait!! Thank you from the bottom of our hearts!'
Really my only regret is that I didn't buy any last year to have an aged bottle ready to go now... I would love to taste what 1 and 2 years ages tastes like... Right now...
Have you heard about MaggiesDirect.com yet? MaggiesDirect.com sells fabulous products for you and your home at reasonable prices. What is different about MaggiesDirect.com is that you can shop through social networking shopping! I had never heard of social networking shopping, so this really intrigued me. Essentially, you earn Social Bucks (1 Social Buck = $1.00 on Maggies) for completing various tasks. For example, you earn Social Bucks for inviting your friends to sign up, for following Maggies on Facebook, receiving their newsletter, reviewing a product, and more! Another perk is that standard shipping is always free to the lower 48 states for those with an account!
I saw the bride & groom yesterday and they said
Jeera/Cumin: 3/4 tsp.
Now, on to the other little pretties. Spring has arrived and I wanted to create something with bright, warm Spring-like colors. These are my new chevrons that you'll be able to see soon on some of my new creations. I've created tiny patters, small patterns and regular wide chevrons, too. My favoites are the "growing" chevrons. These are the ones that seem to get larger as your eyes travel down the pattern. I even threw in a few Easter-inspired colors.
Since graduating from college with an English degree, I have focused most of my attention on being a stay-at-home mom. But now, six years later, I want to do something different. I'm ready. Next month my kids will be attending school full-time and I am excited to start my career. Unfortunately, the companies I've reached out to seem less excited. What can I do to change their mind?
8. Draw a long oval shape touching the right side of the big oval near the top.
It is so hard to watch her kill herself. These are the sordid details of a grown child lost in the terrible world of addiction.
After we put the sail back up and adjusted the daggerboard, we were off. I learn best by trial and error – by someone showing me how to do it once, then trying it and learning from my mistakes. Amy showed me how to steer the boat (when you want to go right, you pull the steering mechanism to the left) and after a few wrong turns, we had a nice rhythm going.
And, Amos...
Non-Violent Direct Action
6) Testing ( and final testing ) of design and prototype.
I am so sick of skirts, and the same old ones at that. I never thought I would say this, but I am. I would really love to make some new tops that are perfect for winter casual wear, like Style Arc's Lexley, except I am kind of scared of that pattern company, having a whole swathe of Style Arc patterns sitting in the naughty corner.
A thousand mill lofts gray,
Return, My Dove!
Back in 2004, El Paso ISD asked juvenile court Judge Chavez to "assign two part-time referees -- court employees who could hear judicial cases -- to the truancy program," reported the El Paso Times. The County Attorney came forward with a proposal to do the job for around $50,000. Instead, Judge Chavez brokered a contract between El Paso ISD and "New Beginnings, a local company run by Cirilo 'Chilo' Madrid and Ruben 'Sonny' Garcia, would spearhead the program. Both men now face federal fraud charges for allegedly bribing County Judge Dolores Briones in exchange for her vote on an unrelated government contract for another company, LKG." Reported the Times, "New Beginnings is now being investigated by the FBI for the $3.2 million in contracts it obtained from the El Paso Independent School District over the five-year period ended in 2007."
I found a cute floppy-eared Jellycat bunny,
Tip: I’ll go for a draw in the 90 minutes, at 13/5.
I've gained a bunch of pounds since I got married, and I keep trying new and different things to get rid of them to no avail. Why is it so hard to stick to things?? I've counted points, starved myself, eaten nothing but lettuce and it was pointless. No matter what I couldn't sustain long enough to make a difference. Diet alone just wasn't working. Here's what's finally doing the trick. I got rid of sugar and carbs about 3 weeks ago, and yesterday was day 6 of Jillian Micheal's 30 day shred. This is the second time around with Jillian. Somewhere along the line during the first round, and after about 6 days "life" got in the way, wore me out, and made me give up on the workout.
If I were you, say something like this if it's something you feel comfortable with, "Sure, I'd love for you to review it, but as of now, I'm only providing ecopies. I would like if you could please post your review on Goodreads, Amazon, Barnes and Nobles" (where ever your book is at). If it's no where yet, i would hold off a bit.
cord plugged into the backside of his pants.
Oh sure, that's a normal news story
This is usually seen and performed while driving past the scene of an accident, or any other incident where there are police, firemen or ambulances with lots of flashing lights, this action results in slowing down the flow of traffic and occasionally causes another accident.
“As a heavily populated city (the most populous metropolitan area in the world), most Tokyoites are squeezed together in hen coup housing and overspilling trains, and so prefer to protect privacy where they can. Books are covered to hide the the cover before they leave the store as the norm. Addresses are obscured with stamps or shredded for privacy and security as bin bags are necessarily transparent. The scissors are designed to be contained and concealed, ninja-like, within the confines of a pencil case, organiser pocket, etc, without taking up but a whisker of precious space. Space is a premium in Tokyo. The same goes for the micro pencils, with their tiny sharpener. There are so many consumers in Tokyo that manufacturers can afford to produce such a wide variety of paperclips and know there will be a market for each design/colour.”
But a Samaritan came to the place where the man was. When he saw the man, he felt sorry for him. He went to him, poured olive oil and wine on his wounds and bandaged them. Then he put the man on his own donkey. He took him to an inn and took care of him. The next day he took out two silver coins. He gave them to the owner of the inn. 'Take care of him,' he said. 'When I return, I will pay you back for any extra expense you may have.'
The cat and the owl were my personal favorites, but the kids immediately gravitated towards the lion. We ran out of lion templates in the first 10 minutes! Making puppets kept the kids occupied for a good hour.
in a single layer. Top the shrimp with the minced garlic, country ham
Skin: CupidSis- Pale- ::Moddish::
But out of those six or seven agents, three who'd previously rejected came back with a request for material. One of them I had to decline, because it arrived about 4 hours after I'd accepted my offer of rep.
Love was a song we sang
The Lassie paused its eating momentarily and gave Moon a very dirty look.
And there's a lot more than just coyotes around here, let me tell you. There's a raccoon or a skunk or a bobcat or a something that likes to ride the girl's ride-on tractor sometimes. At least sometimes I hear the tractor moving all around the back patio. I wish I could get a picture of that for you. Or a picture of one of these big, brazen, glossy- coated- well- fed- coyotes that we see. But for now you'll have to be satisfied with this audio clip of the start of a coyote party. If you have pets you might want to send them out of the room. When Cooper hears this clip he gets a big poofy tail and hides.
You know what, Lucy? I think I’ll join you...
Andrew: get what
In the cake, instead of regular whole milk, I used buttermilk, which gives it such a nice creamy, tangy burst of flavor, a little trick I learned from my friend Jen in grad school. I'll do my best to keep it so that you can make this at sea level too, but here is the original recipe and the NPR article. You'll see I'll add a different value, # @SL, meaning use this amount if you are at sea level!
Lastly, and my personal favourite, nothing adds character like wall stickers. Oh yes, they can be costly if you look around, even going up to $200 for elaborate ones but if you have bookshelves, beds and desks around your walls I hardly think you'll require, or maybe not even fit, a giant olive tree complete with flock of escaping birds...You can find wall stickers either online OR many retailers who deal in home decor do sell them, including the likes of Target who at this very moment are selling a florel set of 6 for about $20. I bought some today so once I get them up I'll tell you how it goes!
"Bathing" by Duncan Grant, 1910
The Best DVD Player Recorders According to Your Needs
- 2 Cups graham cracker crumbs
These are my people.
This morning on our walk tho' she reacted to a car that slowed way down to a crawl to go past - so slow we were walking faster than the car. I'll give her that - it was weird. And the school bus... with it's loud, diesel engine and flashing lights....
One morning, having finished my breakfast, I was leaving the dining room. As I passed her station her phone rang. She picked up the phone and I heard her say, "I'm sorry, Mr. Hoffman isn't here."
1.) If you up-load your creation to any on-line photo galleries, please use SFC0212 for your keywords when loading your creation photo there. 1b) please leave a comment on the challenge blog post so that someone from Squigglefly can validate your entry for the prize.
But… to me it is fun creating characters. It’s like a puzzle, prying out their secrets. Or it’s an archaeological dig. But it needs to be done, and doing so is interesting because humans are interesting.
So I got a little curious.
2 tsp. sugar
"S. Klein" appears in the tile before the door of 68 Clinton Street, now Falai, a falafel joint.
Me and a few girlfriends decided it would be a hoot to go see a show that it currently on its run in Oslo: A Tribute to Dirty Dancing. I mean, hey, light entertainment, some songs, and they promised some kick ass dancing, so why the hell not, right?
Repeat rows 1-3 of farmer body
**Yes, I was shocked that he was one of the people to speak out about this.
If you think your home might be at risk of flooding you can check by entering your postcode on the Environment Agency Flood Map.
Hope you're having a wonderful time with your families, enjoy the moments of Sweet Nothing!!
We are the hope that lives between
To be vexed at a trifle or two that I writ,
This song was first presented to me by my friend Marshall on the camping trip that featured a buried hogs head. He has a knack for playing a song 4-5 times an hour when he thinks it is important for it to be stuck in everyone’s head. When I told him I was heading to Florence where he had studied abroad with his wife 10 years ago, he used a similar approach to pushing the tripe sandwiches by the mercato.
It’s really humorous how a tiny brawl could end a friendship worth 15 years. You practically grow up with certain people and have also fought all your life with them under the tag of love. Where there is love, there are arguments? And you patch up all through the journey yet one day you grow up and your ego grows bigger than what your relationship was worth. It just startles me. A week ago I was frantic trying to find out whether certain people were dead or alive, and today I realise they were in the neighbourhood for over two weeks and I hadn’t got the slightest clue. Fifteen years. Thats precisely 5478 days of knowing a person. *laughs* Oh, the irony!
And then the recordings stopped. Dave got a job as a postman and got himself a woman. For some reason that diverted his attentions elsewhere. I’m not bitter but I do blame Dave unreservedly for ruining our chances of getting onto the telly or the radio. Because, to be honest, Rik Mayal’s and Ade Edmondson’s “Bottom” wasn’t that far removed from the type of material that Dave and I were coming up with off the top of our head’s week after week.
The same applies to Jack Wilshere. Not only is he letting the nation down by not being part of England’s ill-fated Euro2012 squad, he is now unlikely to be part of TeamGB which is just a heinous crime for the host country. Yes, I know that the Euros have not taken place yet but this is England we (I) am talking about and since 1970, every campaign has ended badly. And yes I sympathise with Wilshere over the Euros and potentially the Olympics but he is young enough to have more chances. Well, not at the Olympics with the Scots likely to secede from the Union, it will be a TeamEnglandWithOneFromWalesAndABallboyFromNorthernIreland and the EBS (Everyone But Scotland) Olympic Committee will go back to ignoring the football tournament. And this is before we consider Jack’s apparent admiration for Jose Mourinho. This is from a society that thinks little of pressing the ‘Like’ button to open a deluge of spam advertising on social media networks.
The fog surrounded me, and I could hardly see the pavement right in front of me. Every ten minutes or so a car would pass me, temporarily blinding me with its headlights. I wondered, briefly, what it’d be like to be hit by a car moving at 50mph. At some point I passed a pedestrian. I thought it was odd that there would be a person walking around in the middle of nowhere past midnight, but then again I was riding around in the middle of nowhere past midnight.
-Who in clothing: Peter ~15 ys, Roberta ~17 ys, sailor suit
And Lay’s were on sale.
Older cabin groups go on a one or two night trip, and learn a bit more about what it takes to live in the wilderness for a short time. We are so proud watching these campers go out with their counselors and JCs in canoes or on a backpacking trail! Although sometimes it rains, or the mosquitoes come out to play, everyone who comes back from their trip can say “I did that!” These kids learn the value of working together to get where they want to go, provide their own meals, and get along in a small group. And they usually have a great time, and have some great stories to tell when they get back!!
- Aaron Hernandez over 5.5 receptions: -115
Nothing is sugar-coated. There are no platitudes about God never giving you more than you can handle, no suggestion that Zach was a kind of ennobling care package sent to teach his driven dad a lesson, to grant him the gift of perspective.
They require leadership to be presented to them in different ways in order to be motivated to respond with excellence.
As we were driving to Walmart, the rain started to fall. By the time we reached the Walmart parking lot it was a torrential downpour. We drove around for a while, waited for the rain to slow a bit, and then we all huddled underneath the umbrella and made our way into the store.
I hope you enjoyed today's projects. Feel free to stop by the Scrapshotz Blog for some great inspiration, tips and techniques, and join the forum for great challenges and a lot of fun!
Sixth is "One, Two, Three" by Ernie Colon (art) and Nicola Cuti (story). A pair of androids, Kleet and Lia are brought in front of a trio of robot judges, on trial for showing emotion. Flashbacks show how they got to this point, with Lia reading fairy tales to the children she takes care of. She becomes obsessed with being rescued by a hero and is thrown out of her master's home when a man comes to the door and she asks him to take her with him. She is pursued by robot searchers and is found by Kleet when she is found playing with flowers in a field. Kleet brings her to an abandoned post but they are eventually caught and brought before the judges. The two are found guilty and brought out to a home in the desert. They are destroyed soon after however when it is revealed that the home is on a nuclear bomb testing site.
Responsible for demonstrating a Pilot Seniors web site at Showcase Ontario, a major governmental conference
3. Everywhere looks prettier when bedecked with snow, everywhere.
In fact, parenting with all of the above may actually guarantee that your children are more likely to struggle in many different ways through out their life than children who are parented unconditionally with respect and freedom, who don't go to school, and who are supported in following their natural patterns of learning and exploring their interests and passions.
Some intrinsic aspects of brewing and beer culture remain valid in my idealistic perspective; community, craft, artistry, commerce, good times, building positive relationships through healthy interaction. Organic craft brewing to me is a natural extension of the best beer ideal. Corporations consider best management practices; organic craft beer is a best practice for living. It's sad that products need to be certified by the government as free of pesticides and other chemicals, but if that's what it takes to inform consumers it's probably worth the hassle and expense.
There have been four issues, where we are the aggrieved party, that have necessitated writing a letter. That seems, to me, to be quite a lot of issues that we are trying to resolve all at the same time. Usually there is only one thorny issue that needs to be sorted out at any given time. One has been sorted out quite quickly, but three others are becoming long standing problems which are proving difficult to resolve. So maybe if I air my grievances here, I might just get a result.
These are just a few of my favorite trinkets I’ve collected over the years. Thanks for reading everyone, and I’d love to hear about your souvenirs… What do you collect? What’s your favorite souvenir and why?
In keeping with tradition, I'm here to host yet another blog hop for those projects that had another fate - perhaps you'll save them for family and friends, once the holiday season rolls around...or maybe you'll keep them for yourself to look at and admire!
Here's a wee close up of Fif, hopefully showing her 3d paper pieced bag a little better.
You also find a lot of broken glass in the woods, because people go a little way off the road to make a fire and drink beer (and stronger stuff). Most of the people I meet in the woods are hikers, occasionally hunters--I try _not_ to go into the woods in hunting season, but what qualifies as "woods" varies, and so does various people's notion of what constitutes hunting season--but by and large, nice folk. I do carry a gun, though, because I'm alone and nobody knows exactly where I am (that being part of the charm of woods-walking). Never needed it, never expect to need, HOPE never to need it--but I do have it (and the concealed-carry permit and sixteen hours of training that goes with it).
And The Cons:
2. Don't make the mistake of thinking white shirts are only good for office wear. I would never wear a shirt during the daytime: it's too formal. Instead, my favourite way of wearing a white shirt is to team it with a sequinned mini skirt or fuller A line skirt and killer heels for a super-sexy evening look.
Regards
so, i thought, okay, i will just post some pictures
The background stamp is by Indigo Blu and I've used versamark and black embossing powder and then torn and inked the edges.
Perhaps the most successful of all these blogs was “Why South Africa Sucks” which, over the years has achieved phenomenal popularity and internet traffic on account of its willingness to “speak truth to power” and tell politically incorrect and uncomfortable truths.
Publisher: Carina Press
It may as be well an enthusiasm for novelty. One would dare say that the organization of this event gave it a sense of simplicity that is often missed in artistic events. Artwork at Showcase Art Exhibition varied in media and in themes and naturally in colors, as it gathered photography, Acrylic paint on canvas, jeans canvas, and mixed media for 12 emerging artists.
I think of this blog as a bit of a show, putting only my best side forward intentionally, and not really revealing a whole lot about my personal life or any of the "not so pretty" bits. I mean the whole premise here is really great design and style. But, I would never want anyone to ever read The Zhush and come away from it thinking that I've got it all together and lead a perfect life.
And I'm also leaving next week to Russia, so dunno what happens then, cause i don't have any outer world connections there.. But well, when i come back in the end of July, there'll be a super huge post then about my whole trip..
And there was I saying about not many non-meat posts.. Unfortunately there’s no picture of my soup because it was nommed before I had a chance.. This is a completely vegetarian dish if you use vegetable stock (I’m assuming curry paste is veggie friendly but it might be as well to check).
People are wrong. And prideful. This is just a new group of neo-Luddites.
PRICE: $89,000
Prakash under pressure! Mr Bicycle wine now has the heavy task of choosing from a pile of plum posts to make him stop crying over the loss of the San Fernando mayorship. Game, Set and Match to the UNC….consolation prizes to the COP.
I scrambled inside, half horrified, half afraid, half grossed-out (yes, I know that makes 3 halves - I was very distraught, you see). I bolted the door and watched through the blinds as the mystery hurler spewed several more liters before being carried away by two other intoxicated buddies.
Pin: Maya Road
The show would usually start with an opening chorus by the ladies in the company (whom, if the audience is lucky, might oblige them with a can-can) There would then follow 12-15 acts of a distinctively 19th-century sort: minstrels, jig dancers, banjo players, harmonizing quartets, acrobats, and so forth. Distinctive types of acts that have not survived the era include: the sand jig—something like tap dancing, but the dancer would pour sand on the floor and make shuffling and sliding noises; playing the bones, as in minstrelsy; the egg dance – wildly dancing around several eggs on the stage without breaking any; “tidy tearing”—rapidly ripping and folding pieces of paper into recognizable shapes; and (with the Civil War fresh in everyone’s minds) military acts, such as gun spinners, and drill companies.
From this we can see that effective social media monitoring is a key to creating and maintaining your community, whether you create your own branded space, or create a presence on a public social networking site.
Hardly anything that was outside that night is still pristine. I took a walk around the garden today and saw that nothing that was young and new and about to open into a flower has life in it anymore. Amazingly, there are exceptions. These two baby Periwinkles survived while all around them in the pot perished. I wonder how. Perhaps being closer to the soil and not hanging out in the frigid air helped.
Sage is the smallest of the three, and seems to be the most delicately built. She was pretty frightened of us when she first arrived, but took a different approach than Spice. Instead of straining against her rope and trying to escape, Sage would just stand super still and stare at us until we went away. There was a mutual agreement that we would just ignore each other and everyone would be happy.
And that’s exactly what we’re going to do with your writing muse gone truant. We’re going to kick her back into gear so you can fill up that blank page.
1. Tattle Monster - And my all time favorite project from 2011 and by far the most popular post on my blog is Murry our Tattle Monster. This cute little monster was created out of frustration with my kids constant need to "tattle" on each other. My school teacher sister had a cute poem she uses in her classroom, but my kids can't read so I needed a way for them to grasp the concept...so Murry was born and I love him to pieces!
Some of our public sector institutions need to update their rules in the face of rapid technological change. Job Centre Plus weren’t best pleased to see me tweeting while waiting for my now fortnightly appointment with them on the ground that they don’t like mobile phones being switched on.
The manifold, soft chimes,
One that is similar to a chapter 13 is a chapter 11. This is mainly used by the larger corporations who have fallen into debt. Once they file, they propose a repayment plan that may help them get out of debt or settle the accounts. In order for this to be approved, the creditors will need to vote on the payment plan. It must also be approved by the court.
I’ve got a few new tricks up my sleeve this week and thought I’d revisit a topic that I posted about early in the life of this blog. I’d love to hear from the aspiring and published writers on this topic. Enjoy! Brad
We have a sequel to “Iron Man” and “Thor” due in 2013 and “Captain America“ in 2014 – the very earliest that we might expect to see an “Avengers” follow-up is 2015 and if Edgar’s cryptic Tweet is to be taken at absolute face value, his much-ballyhooed “Ant Man“ movie might be nearer to being green-lit than previously thought. Which would give us another suitable member of the “Avengers” squad to cheer on in a couple of years, all being well.
Mark responded with his staccato, “Ha HAH!”
I am anxiously waiting to see if I made conditions to their liking.
Kosovo's government blamed Serbia for setting up the vote that it said was an illegal act aimed at undermining Kosovo's statehood.
My mom is always telling me to drink green tea for the antioxidants and health benefits. But given the choice, I always choose coffee. Sorry mom! I will however, eat green tea ice cream. I can eat lots and lots of it!
Excellent digital radio broadcast. Danko Jones was touring in support of fifth album "Below the Belt" and this show includes one song from that and a selection of earlier tracks, all performed with the ban's usual gusto.
Cricut Cuts - Frame - Elegant Edges cut at 3" & Flower - Cindy Loo Cut at 2"
- Range Rover
That day at court when the judge wouldn't hear the concerns I had for my children or the risks that I was trying to avoid - something took root.
Brokenness to wholeness…
Honey, Twilight & Cocoa ink
Then eat them all before anyone else knows you made them. These can be put in the fridge if you have any leftover, but I don’t really like them out of the fridge. The strawberries will start to release a little bit of strawberry juice-liquid and they get a little sloppy. But they’re still good.
It wasn't just the taste... but the smell... I can't even describe it. You'd have to go out and purchase one and smell it yourself. And I don't recommend doing so.
Smiles all around with this cheery yellow quilt. With kaleidoscope blocks on her design wall behind her, she holds up her latest completed block. Oh yes.... triple senior moment with the last three photos :-).
My mother also made her a little pinafore out of some green floral fabric. You can read the story of the fabric here on my mum's blog, as well as see a cute preschool photo of me!
(I should note that topes are not just for Christmas. We saw a small tope with my parents in Quepos one spring.)
Q. What’s your favorite genre to write in? What type of writing do like best—long, short, fiction, nonfiction?
Tomato sauce, 3 table spoons
Here are the beautiful creations from Team A. Stop by next Thursday for more inspiration from Team B
Kari: Polk himself is an interesting dude, but he’s so unlikeable that it was hard to read about him. He promised to serve as President for only one term, and he achieved all four well-defined goals he promised at his election. I mean, that takes a very dedicated, very cocky sort of person that must have been pretty ruthless and merciless in his actions. It was also fascinating how much Polk altered the executive branch of the government and gave the President so much power over Congress. (This was done by his declaration of war against Mexico in 1848, just to put it
Usually, my immune system gets somewhat compromised after a 100-miler. (Somehow, I've avoided getting sick, even though everybody around me has been sick for the last month). What may have helped this year is that I didn't start running until 10 full days after the event. I've been lifting and working out in the gym for a while since I got back, in lieu of running. Last night, I ran a fast and furious night trail run with Caleb, Shane, and Cody. I only did one 6-mile loop, though, and then had a nice hot bath and some homemade hot soup. Better not push a good thing. I really wanted to go for two, though.
125 5. “$25,000 and a Sense of Proportion: On the Downtown Center.” University of Chicago Maroon, February 19, 1974, p. 3. (Source: Item D-II/15/1974, below.)
The attempt this week by the Vatican’s Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith (CDF) to control the Leadership Conference of Women Religious (LCWR), the leading national organization of Catholic nuns in the U.S., is being widely criticized by Catholics and others, as people across the country start to express outrage at the decision and support for these women of faith.
My son will be making his First Communion this Saturday for the second time. Say What? You read that right. My son made his first communion back in the Fall of 2009. He went with his father and older sister to a work day at the Monastery with Father Kirby. While there they attended a mass. Father Kirby happened to accidently give Pumpkin communion. As soon as mass was over Father Kirby realized what had happened and sat down to talk to the boy. It was determined that the sacrament was valid, even though Pumpkin was only 5 1/2 years old. Yup, at 5 1/2 her had a complete understanding of the sacrament. In fact this occasion became a matter of discussion and a teaching moment for Deacon G and his classmates while they were in formation.
I'm quite pleased with this photo in most ways, there's a clarity in her gaze which I can appreciate, and a friendly countenance which I enjoyed during our short conversation.
Mr. Parker had already forgot to use his own preposterous codeword for gun.
This celebrated brewery's intriguing and rather ingenious plan was to send along just two titles consisting of one sample each, but to then back up this delivery with a short email saying that these beers were merely "to get you started".
This week, I learned a new card game: cacheta (pronounced: kahshetta), also known as pife (pronounced: peefy). I’m still a rookie, so I’m going to get some things wrong here. This first thing I noticed is that the game is very similar to Gin, except it’s played with two full decks, and usually more than two players. Each player gets 9 cards, instead of 10, and runs/sets have to be exactly three cards (except if you go out with 10 cards, then one can be a group of four cards). I did alright in the game. I lost. But, you know, I had fun. The dealer also turns a card up before the game begins. This card signifies the joker (curinga). If a 10 of clubs appears, the Jack of clubs is the joker. If a three of spades appears, the four of spades is the joker, and so on. Since there are two decks, there are always two jokers in the deck. Players take turns drawing a card from the deck or taking the discard from the previous player (and only the previous discard is available). Just like Gin, first one to go out wins. You can go out with 9 cards, by discarding, or you can go out with 10 cards by using the previous discard as your tenth card (in which case you can have a group of four cards in your hand — 4 fours or 5,6,7,8 or whatever). You get double points (10 points for a 9 card win, 20 points for a 10 card win) going out with 10. Scoring is a little difficult, but basically you play with 7 dimes. After every round, the winner gets a dime (or two if they have a 10-card win). Once all the dimes are gone, the top scorer wins. If there’s a tie, those players play to win the dimes of the other players. The losers sit out and watch. It’s a fast and fun game. Surely twists exist and scoring could be different. What I want to know is, what does pife and cacheta taste like? And where do you get bottles of these liquors?
What took their lives, and heads as well
Reports say the long-range missile broke apart in the air and crashed right into the ocean. The North Korean rocket launch failed. And Kim Jong-un is blaming Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo and Renato Corona.
- Brian Smith / tenor & soprano saxes, flute
Two white men arrested as suspects in shootings that killed three, wounded two black victims.
It is such a joy to be associated with Denise Lynn of Whimsy Stamps as a Guest Designer. She is such a sweetheart and such a pleasure to work for. Thank you so much, Denise, for all of the many kindnesses you always show. From Denise...
This shot is composed of 2 rows and 13 columns a total of 26 frames stitched in Photoshop. 26 frames at 10 seconds each, panning from left to right, 0 to 180 degrees. I down tilted my panoramic tripod head to capture the foreground and up tilted it to capture the subject and background sky. It took my quad core, 8GB RAM PC 20 minutes to stitch these 26 frames. The result was 1.3 Giga Byte tiff 16-bit unedited file. I exported this file to Lightroom 4 and did the usual cropping to 6 X 18, adjustment of clarity, white balance, sharpness, color etc etc. The result was a 339 Mega Bytes tiff 16-bit file and 118 Mega Pixels.
Other - PTI Vintage Buttons, Paper source Red Gem Embellishment, SU Oval Punch, Sizzix Framelit die for the bicycle
Ninth on my list is LA CEREMONIE (France, 1995), by Claude Chabrol, part of SUSPICION: THE FILMS OF CLAUDE CHABROL AND ALFRED HITCHCOCK, January 13-February 25, following the death of Chabrol in 2010. I haven't read A Judgment in Stone, the Ruth Rendell book that LA CEREMONIE is based on, but considering the primacy of plot and social circumstance, it makes sense that LA CEREMONIE is based on her writing. LE BOUCHER should also be on my list, but I chose LA CEREMONIE, probably because it features two of my favorite French actresses, Sandrine Bonnaire and Isabelle Huppert, not to mention Jacqueline Bisset.
Perhaps I’ve been away from raiding too long to understand the meta-aspects of the balance the lockouts introduce. Hmm.
Interviews will be held at the History Project’s exhibition center on Surf Avenue under the Cyclone. Those with a story to tell can also schedule an interview in advance by emailing info@coneyislandhistory.org.
Hummus sandwich with avocado
A minute or two behind us, the other attendees arrived. I was very surprised not to meet anybody whom I recognized, as these events tend to be as much social get-togethers for the conspiratorially-aware community as lectures. However Ustane and I soon began conversations with the others and before long provisional friendships emerged in the accelerated and condensed way they tend to in the intensity of a conference. We spoke to a cheerful young woman named Leah and a man who had had a dream the night before that he saw the auditorium we were in, even though he’d never been there before. Once again, the theme of manifestation, premonition and synchronicity emerged, and it was to become curiouser and curiouser as Ian began his speech and revealed that the previous week when he’d spoken in Portsmouth one of the attendees had experienced something even weirder: He had been severely delayed for some reason which meant that by the time he left for Portsmouth to see Shift 2 he only had half an hour left before the start of the event, but unfortunately he lived seventy miles away and so he began driving there in frustration, consigning himself to having to miss the first half of the event. But somehow he made it on time! How? He has no idea. It seemed that he experienced something similar to the phenomenon of “missing time” that is often a symptom of alien abduction. In this case maybe no aliens were involved, but something else which I’ll come to later. I would like to have spoken to that man, so I must say I was kicking myself a bit because I’d originally planned to go to the Shift 2 event in Portsmouth, but had switched my booking to Birmingham.
Book Fairs (London, Frankfurt, Bologna)
I'll explain the blog title later on, but it is going take a bit to get there. Because this is a tough show to review. It is also the most passionate and dramatic performance on the Seattle REP stage this year (and this year included Of Mice and Men).
“I’ll trade you a ‘Melinda from Springfield’ for your ‘Peggy from Rochester’ rookie card.”
Are you done with that? Good. Now go watch all the rest.
Having established this, I’d also like to add that, if you have any questions about Catholicism (I’m happy to answer them!) please ask on my website. It’ll be more organized and easier to find for both of us.
While I was not in the market for a 1/6th share in a $1million power cruiser, it is still nice to look and dream. I took my father, who is not the snappiest dresser, brown shoes with black pants, grey and balding sporting a Peugeot jacket. The uniform of a retiree, that has just got his hands on his superannuation. He certainly had the attention of the sales representatives. The crappy world market and the strong Australian dollar, means that the imports are super cheap and the reps are super eager to make sales. So if your in the market for a new boat there are some bargains to be had.
The beloved European character Barbapapa, and his friends, are back on the BIG screen at Big Movies! Thanks to a few adequate shape changes and their brilliant imagination, they bring an end to even the most difficult of problems, and always in the gentlest manner. The films will be presented in their original French, but trust us, no translation is necessary. (France; 1970; color animation; approximately 67 minutes)
Woken on a park bench to know I was finally forlorn
Label: Stuf Records
can't even remember
Sea Salt (or himalayan salt)
This blog post contains highly sensitive material including confession and personal exposure. Those faint of heart and destitute of stamina should cease reading here. If this opening paragraph excites you because you enjoy watching pain and embarrassment like a circus performer falling from a tightrope 175 feet from the ground, you are sick. Go away and stop following my blog while you seek psychiatric help.
This rule helps the best with overexcitement. For the puppy – engage in no talk, no touch, no eye contact until your puppy calms down and submits. For the gayby – use no talk, no touch, no eye contact when you have exhausted all other methods and your gayby is still acting like a complete and total, little, a**hole. Make sure NOT to initiate this method when a social worker is at your side conducting a home review. At other times, it is perfectly acceptable to use sparingly on your own spawn. This method was used on me and it is the only reason that I can entertain myself at all. For the drag queen – no talk, no touch, no eye contact should be used to enforce your rules. For example, if you have said to the drag queen, “Hun, you can use whatever special effects you want in your act as long as they clean them up afterwards.” Yet, your drag queen is refusing to do so – this is the moment to apply this method. Perhaps your drag queen has a new number where, as she sings KD Lang’s “Wash me clean” vodka shoots out of her fake boobs. It’s a show stopping performance. You love it. But, your drag queen has become a diva. She releases the vodka, accepts her standing ovation, and never returns to clean it up. When this happens – no talk, no touch, no eye contact. Ignore her. Ignore the number and ignore her requests for one more drink ticket. After a few minutes, you will hear your drag queen quietly mopping up the vodka with the secondhand dress of the other drag queen that she hates and all will have returned to normal.
And this morning, I noticed a crack in Carolyn’s closet (which isn’t even anywhere near where they are doing work!) that hadn’t been there before. They had moved some lamps over to her closet. I bet they were sloppy and hit the closet or knocked one over into the wood, cracking it. Knotty pine isn’t cheap and we may ask them to replace that as well!
1 women--typically
Missoula Children’s Theatre is a traveling theatre company where two directors will come to a town for one week, teach 50-60 children (ages 6-18) a show, and have a performance at the end of the week. They pack not only all of the costumes, but the whole set in a small truck and travel across the country. Many directors even travel internationally! It still amazes how just two people can teach so many kids in such a short amount of time!
First course: Watermelon mint gazpacho
I'm so sorry Miss Gaga. I'm really getting off track here. Back to your segment on Ellen. I think what really bothered me the most was that you felt you needed a political reason behind wearing this. "If we don't stick up for what we believe in, we don't fight for our rights, pretty soon we're gonna have as much rights as the meat on our bones." WHAT?! What in the world does that even mean? Miss Gaga, I feel that I have the capacity to think in both logical, and abstract ways, but I still cannot make sense of what you said.
Event hours are Noon to 9 p.m. Friday and Saturday, and Noon to 5 p.m. Sunday. Admission into the event is free. The purchase of a $6 reusable, compostable cornstarch glass is required for tasting beer, as are tokens, which sell for $1 apiece. A full glass of beer or cider costs four tokens and a four-ounce taste costs one token; select beers cost double tokens. Patrons receive a $1 discount toward the tasting glass with a validated MAX ticket, a ticket from the onsite bike corral, or three cans of food for the Oregon Food Bank. The festival benefits the Leukemia Lymphoma Society and the Oregon Food Bank.
This whole thing is "android's" fault for not putting more damn alarms on my phone.
I've seen other blogs fade and die,
Therefore, the word is received casually if not indifferently as the word of man, that is to say, without effect. Perhaps we have been filling up on verbal “junk food” and have dulled our appetites for “real food” by the profusion of much speaking of our own that leaves us sated if not bloated, and therefore we suffer malnutrition in the midst of seeming plenty. Certainly we lack the evidence of growth and change that the word of God should accomplish, and we seem fixed in our immaturity and shallowness.
Going on in my techhie world, 2 computers down, one in for repairs for tHe second time in 2 weeks, and my phone deceided to half work. I am typing this from my new phone, great deal BUT now iam locked in another 2 year contract.
I never was able to tell who had the most.
He was singing “Stop Draggin My Heart Around” with Elise Testone and when he did that little dance while singing “this doesn’t have to be the big get even. This doesn’t have to be anything at all” there was a slight shift and … I had a crush. A big, cougar crush on this annoying, irritating guy. He’s not even my TYPE if he weren’t already half my age. I don’t like blondes… or light brown, whatever that color is. (except on Brad Pitt, can you blame me?)
Root was good at beatin' the devil around the stump -- which basically meant that he was lazier than a hound dog on a Sunday afternoon.
My husband has his own business and his idea of keeping receipts for me is using plastic baggies filled with all kinds of receipts--this time I am being literal--ALL kinds!!
Au Revoir, Goodbye and Good Luck.
It was very hard for me to choose only 3 out of a wonderful 60 entries. I would like to thank who all applied and encourage you to keep trying with us and other DT teams in the future as all of your work was just fabulous and made the choice very hard.
The bad – I fell on my ankle earlier during skating, and was lucky not to sprain it. My gumshield makes my gums bleed, because my teeth have moved. I didn’t get chance to plant my peas earlier. I really need to work on my flexibility and balance too, after the amount of times I tripped!
Pilatus was amazed."
Guy Pearce is a punching bag. He is a man without a past, able to negotiate with or win against authority. This lanky figure, under the shadows of independent cinema, portrays movies’ masculine myths, sleuth, cowboy, king, explorer, diver, fishing on both good and evil. He says your insecurities loud enough for you to hear. I referenced at least five of his movies but he relives them all in the Luc Besson-incepted and Stephen St. Leger and James Mather-directed sci-fi Lockout, a movie set in 2079, while wearing a women’s sized medium graphic tee to expose his veiny biceps, telling audiences he’s not too old to play the Hollywood game of Commonwealth actors working out on the gym to get leading roles. He’s passable as a sellout but let’s be honest, he bagged this role because Hugh Jackman was busy and Pearce wants to buy a condo and put kids through college.
while driving through Death Valley
"If I am a foreign spy -- any legislation which makes my work harder won't be nice for me," Cwele told the National Council of Provinces ad-hoc committee dealing with the bill.
30-something: Does he have kids? A job? Is he married? No for real, he’s not married right?
"A Window to His Love."
You know how when you're in line at a bargain store like Marshall's or TJ Maxx, they like to bombard you with last minute things you never knew you needed but suddenly have to have? They designed that set-up for suckers like me. And the other day, true to form, I was checking out at TJ Maxx with nothing more than a pair of kitten-shaped hand-warmers (which I only bought for Jack because he'd been playing with them for the past twenty minutes and had most likely sucked on one of them at some point), when a package of stationery caught my eye. There was a fox in a top hat leaping across the bottom of the page, above the quote, "Imagination rules the world."
There are a couple of reasons it’s a downer. First, Infante’s main point is that it’s hard to measure a correlation between cheating and success because we lack adequate tools. You can point to the edges…
Frankie watched herself in the mirror as she danced in the strip joint - it was the only way to get through her act. But then the fat man came into the club, and the siren screamed, and Frankie's world shattered like a thousand shards of glass.
This example doesn’t seem like that big of a deal, but it can be really hard to sit back and not say anything when you watch someone shoot up in the bathroom of a gas station, or you film a boy taking 10 prescription pills at once, or you watch a girl try to prostitute herself for drug money. One producer explained that he was filming a young girl who was responsible for taking care of her whole family and was at the grocery store with a check borrowed from a friend when the check wouldn’t go through. She had no other means of paying for the food for her family and she broke down. All of the producer wanted to do was reach in his pocket and get the money for the groceries, but he couldn’t do it. They really do their best to shoot raw footage so the stories of these individuals aren’t altered.
Contest Rules: Please read my Liability Disclosures and Policy statement before entering giveaways hosted here. Updated 12/8/2011 This giveaway is open to US Residents age 18 or older. The number of eligible entries received determines the odds of winning. Winners will be announced by April 16, 2012 and will have 24 hours to claim their prize. If potential Prize winner forfeits or does not claim the prize, prize will be re-awarded, in Sponsor’s sole discretion. All prizes will be awarded. All entrants agree to release of liability of the sponsor, RachelleWrites. No purchase necessary. Void where prohibited. Open to legal residents of the 48 Lower U.S. & D.C., 18 & older. Begins 12:00 a.m. EST on 05/11/12 & ends 11:59 p.m. MST on 05/17/12. Here's the linky list for the other blogs holding giveaways!
He had every possible option open to him because of who he was. He would not have been questioned for opening an investigation after what he had heard. Paterno was in a position where he could have helped. In fact, the situation absolutely demanded more from Paterno. He did next to nothing.
AdriN2001: But I just know now.
feeling trapped and wounded
Additionally, we have the Illidari Council in Black Temple. Again, four blood elves are guarding further infiltration of their master’s lairs. Apparently blood elves make great councilmen (and women). This brings our total up to 9.
"So, she doesn't have to get off the train at Swindon?"
This guide was decades in the making! ;)
*Stars Dean Cain (The Way Home, Superman, The Three Gifts, etc...) and Luke Schroder, the son of Ricky Schroder (Silver Spoons, Lonesome Dove, etc...)
23For the fear of God kept me back, and because of his power I might not do such things.
36.) My Campaign Had Nothing To Do With The 1984 Ad - NOT EXACTLY, your own
Values are relatively static. Who you are as a person doesn’t change radically, for most, and who your company is shouldn’t either. As a company evolves so will its core values. These changes should be a fine tuning rather than a complete overhaul.
hit a yard sale, and dropped in on Fredrick of Scandinavian Grace.
More office space possible?
A big disappointment was not being able to march in the funeral parade for President Roosevelt. (I wasn’t tall enough.) But I did march in the parade for Admiral Nimitz when he came back from the Pacific.
Steamed Carrots
You see, this little guy decided today was the best day to be born...and why not, it is called mother's day for a reason.
The older two applied to a new Teen Animation School to learn how to create animated videos, hosted by the Entrepreneur Academy in conjunction with Motivate Cape Town.
Il se pique Germaine
More than two thousand miles all the way
And I love that Skotska skata is Swedish for Scottish magpie (my stepnieces told me.)
Chris...Stephen Billington
In late February 2012, African Sports Monthly, the only Digital Sports Magazine for Africa, will be offering its first Print Edition for the March 2012 Issue Subtitled ‘Nations Cup Special Edition’.
Here are a couple of videos that illustrate this point that I think are worth your time. The first is from the TED Conference I attended, which speaker Brene Brown (who also has an excellent TED Talk) described this way:
Osprey Beach: I’ve dubbed this sandy spot on the lake Osprey Beach because it seems like the perfect place to watch for the trail’s namesake bird. Regardless of which direction you’re headed on the trail, it appears suddenly from out of the forest, presenting a dramatic lake view unobstructed by low hanging branches. Once on the beach, you’ll find that it is wide and deep, and roughly elliptical in shape. A fallen tree makes a great place to stop and have lunch or take a water break while enjoying the breeze and view of Lake Townsend. (Approximately 15 minutes walking time from Church Street parking lot.)
A housemade butterpuff pastry is immediately presented to our table. The pastry is effortlessly light and flaky, topped with a quenelle of fluffy green olive mascarpone.
“I know a lot of people not in sports, Jenna.”
- Cross Street Market - Located in the historic Federal Hill neighborhood, this little market has a handful of stalls and a fun atmosphere on the Charles Street end, with huge cheap beers and raw oysters served to a fun crowd every day from lunchtime through happy hour.
This shot I took from the same side of the Canyon but around a bend that positioned me in front. It was a wonderful sight that I had to document with my camera.
Here are some pics of our growing babies. Most of the fuzz on their wings is gone now, replaced by beautiful soft feathers. I’ve also been researching plans for a chicken coop which they will need to be in by July 1st.
“It means I hope you like pushing a broom.”
Ok, I’ll let a lot of that slide, but who the hell was the Doctor supposed to be tricking?? Seriously? I can see that working if he was trying to pull a fast one on the Silence, or all the creatures of the Universe. But Time itself? The reason the alternate world was created where history was all happening at once, was because the Doctor’s Death was a fixed point in time and it didn’t happen. River changed a fixed point in time and made that happen, because Time has rules of engagement, and when Time Lords (or Children if Time) don’t play by the rules of Time, everything goes wonky, with serious consequences. So, Moffat, do you really think that because the Doctor hid inside of a frakkin android that this could actually fool Time itself? Really? If River’s refusal to kill him caused Time to collapse in on itself, surely his own plan to cheat death should have caused another collapse. And how did the fake Teselecta body gain the ability to start the regeneration process, where all the time vortex stuff bursts out of every appendage? And the River from the beach was most certainly NOT the same River that wound up in the 5:02 alternative timeline. She hadn’t become the River we know by the time she’s stuffed into the suit and sent to kill the Doctor, not even close.
Yet as he raised his scythe aloft
"Americans should be free to say "yes" or "no" to using vaccines without being harassed or punished for the informed decision they make," said Dr. Mercola. "Like any drug or medical procedure a doctor recommends, getting a vaccine is a personal health choice and the voluntary consent of the patient is absolutely necessary."
The Victorian State Government in Australia has recently passed legislation which will allow in-house lawyers to undertake pro bono work. Previously, they could not do so owing to restrictions that prevented holders of corporate practicing certificates from engaging in pro bono legal practice.
I believe that together we can ensure low and mid-income individuals continue to receive quality education at CUNY institutions. I join you in requesting CUNY's budgetary needs be met.
The rap song yes is a little annoying but it’s tv and Sam understands that some viewers need a break.
A Hen in the Wardrobe is a fun, light-hearted book perfect for younger readers and with some great illustrations thrown in there's plenty to entertain the young reader as they join Ramzi and his family on their adventures in North Africa.
New high tech machines read minds and detect "thoughts."
I once had a case where the wife was always self-employed. She never contributed to social security. Her first marriage was to a man who had been married twice before. He was older and already collecting social security. She was a much younger wife, but approaching her mid 50′s. When her divorce process started she had been married almost 9 years. The divorce took right at a year. I informed her about the 10 year requirement, but she either wouldn’t listen or didn’t believe me. She was not going to receive any alimony so her biggest benefit would be qualifying to receive half of his social security when she reached her full benefit age. The attorney finalized the divorce at 9 years and 11 months. The client never told the attorney, the attorney was unaware of the 10 year qualifying rule. A year later I ran into the former client and she told me that I was right and that she should have listened to me. She said at the time she didn’t realize the impact it would make. Now she is back to where she was, no reported income and now not enough time to build up her own benefits.
Here is another edition of 18th century inspired gifts for the holiday season. Our theme is perfume!
"You can teach children to dream of a bright new future or you can teach them to build it with their own two hands."--Unknown
Nationalists know this. For a sensible approach to the nuclear club question you need to vote for a Nationalist candidate at election time.
So here am sat head in lap
My Islam is Brother Gad uniting the Twelve Tribes of Israel
Finding Cheap Clothes for Women
Once out of the lock it was hard right and down the very straight relief channel.
This still equals a lot of bouncing for the zoo, hence the cardboard box. I am down to 5 spiderlings, Sid, Nata, and a new A. avic that I have yet to name.
A paint job which produced a shining silver sock has left bosses red-faced.
“Hold on spider-monkey”
1 'fore
perhaps the ghost of that death
10. Prolapse - Flat Velocity Curve
Meet a sloth in Costa Rica
It has been a bit of an emotional rollercoaster for me this week – brilliant highs but painful lows, when I have been forced to feel painful emotions without alcohol to numb them.
5. The tongue is mightier than the pen.
Courtesy of AdNews, a “winning” ad with Charlie Sheen.
d) Is the period of 36 hours within which the intermediary must take down infringing content, a reasonable period? How was this figure arrived at?
May 12 – Nashville, TN – The Basement
On defense, Mays was just as much of a force. He won 12 Gold Glove Awards (in consecutive years) and holds the all-time record for putouts by an outfielder with a total of 7,095. "The Catch", which took place in Game 1 of the 1954 World Series against the Indians, is the most iconic defensive play in the history of Major League Baseball. He owns a career fielding percentage of .981.
This text is distinctive because the writers openly call attention to silence as a rhetorical, linguistic sign. Expanding this text to consider the impact of the French Revolution, two themes start to emerge, the silence and suppression part. All you have to do is write, write about how your first chapter comes first because you want to introduce this idea of the French Revolution as somehow related to this uptick in silent works, works that are interested in the ways that language can somehow express absence, whatever, absence of understanding, feeling, thought, it’s about the not understanding, the sense of loss that romantic writers felt, they felt frustrated, confused, like, what is happening in the world? And the only way they could come to terms with this was by looking to nature, like I haven’t said that a million times before
As if all this new beer wasn't enough we're happy to announce that our entry for the Cheers to Belgian Beers festival this year will be brewed in collaboration with Corey Blodgett. He wrote a nice piece on his own blog about the joint project. We've yet to get together and iron out a recipe but do know from the dart toss that we'll be brewing something strong and dark. Mmm, anyone remember Corey's Biere de Noel?
Asian Red Cabbage Salad with Pan Roasted Chicken
I feel so bad that my siblings will have to go through more of this, but I had to leave for my own sanity.
5 Standing In The Sunshine 8:34
Grated Coconut - 1 Cup
I have been busy completing so many different tasks, that the task of updating my blog got pushed to the back burner. The end of my teaching year is quickly approaching which means there has been piles of grading, student artwork to frame for our school district show, and lesson plans in which to make final adjustments.
Scooping with the nets is easy. The children were almost always surprised at how many water beads they could catch with the net. Emptying the nets is a little trickier. The normal operation for emptying a net does not work. A child cannot just tip it to pour the beads out because of the gauzy, limp structure of the net. When pouring and shaking motions don't work, it is easier just to reach into the net to take the beads out.
Very Important Announcement, that is:
FH: In Birkenhead Market I once saw a very old woman, clean, you know, but she was trying to sell these two or three sprigs of mint that she’d taken from a garden. So I just gave her some money and asked her to promise me that she’d buy herself a dinner.
Til next time, happy stitching.
2012-03-28
"Whenever issues of race come up, it's seen as a distraction."
"We are worried about how criminals are getting their hands on our uniforms and equipment," he said.
That raises questions about DDDB's capacity to maintain legal challenges as Forest City, bolstered by a new loan from the National Basketball Association for the Nets, limps ahead, renegotiating with unions at Beekman, and with more of a commitment to Atlantic Yards--the arena, at least--than nearly anything else in its portfolio. After all, a new arena would mean an end to losses from the Nets and an immediate increase in the value of the team.
OTHER: As always when discussing the weather, the length and severity of summer vary by region. Also keep in mind that the cues from your childhood may no longer be common today, or may be confined to smaller, specific areas. Squeaking screen doors and open windows were summer fixtures from my past. But with changing times, more people have a/c, so unless your character lives in a less temperate region, these cues are now the exception rather than the norm.
Today, in the UK, 88% of renal transplants are functioning. There are many more people still on organ waiting lists. Some of them are 17. I'm on the organ donor register here and in the US. It is transplant week here in the UK. I wonder if you might click over and consider becoming a donor in the UK , in the US,. or in your country.
Since the wife is eight months into her pregnancy, the husband has to sleep on the floor to avoid any regrettable mistake, which might happen pretty easily, for he has been desperate for sex for quite a while now.
Given the grave nature of these allegations, and in light of the confusion in the parish and the concerns expressed by parishioners, Father Guarnizo is prohibited from exercising any priestly ministry in the Archdiocese of Washington until all matters can be appropriately resolved, with the hope that he might return to priestly ministry.
Frozen Fruit (plain, no syrup)
I’ve always been surprised that Inspector Gadget never made a gigantic comeback the way most children’s properties seem to every few years. Oh there was that silly live action movie a few years ago, sure… but the cartoon was fantastic and a real cornerstone of my childhood. Perhaps it’s a show best left in the past, considering half the appeal of the character lay in Don Adams’ voicework.
Professional photography requires not only the skill but also the creativity. Every individual interested in photography prepared with the right equipment for their photo shoot. It is essential for a self-starters and freelance photographers to have easily transportable equipment with them that provides high quality results t. However, they need to consider themselves that what equipment they mostly require.
Maria Loi’s BIO
336 Kevin Kouzmanoff
When I was a kid, I used to see Marx Brothers movies on TV and I didn’t think they were particularly funny. But, when I later saw them in a cinema, with an audience, they were very very very funny indeed.
It was then time for Meredith to perform. She played a Haydn piano sonata. She explained that after lessons wherein she taught this piece she would sit down and play over and over, because she just loved it. The first movement was charming and her performance incandescent, a frolicking charm filled our ears. Following this was a poignant second movement. This adagio was performed with exquisite style and if you can believe it even more charm. That is until the end. Haydn expected the performer to continue to the final movement and so left the harmony unresolved at the conclusion of the second, however Meredith did not see fit to play that final movement for us. The effect was devilish.
